Abaddon [< Hebrew, destruction] - 1. a place of destruction; the depths of hell; an underworld abode of lost souls; a compartment of Gehenna; 2. Apollyon; the destroyer; the angel of the bottomless pit; the king of an army of locusts
abaque - a nomogram; a set of n parallel scales, one for each variable in an equation
abductive reasoning - (related to the affirmation of a consequent)
Abilene paradox - that a group may collectively decide on a course of action that is counter to the preferences of many of the group's members because those individuals fail to raise objections
abiogenesis -
abnegate - 1. to give up (rights or a claim, for example); renounce; 2. to deny (sth) to oneself
aborticide - killing of a fetus; abortion
abracadabra [< Aramaic, Abəra kaDavəra, I would create as I spoke] -
abrogate - to abolish, do away with, or annul, esp. by authority
abscission - 1. the act or process of cutting off; removal; 2. the natural separation of flowers, fruit, or leaves from plants at a special separation layer
absquatulate - to depart hastily; to abscond; to die; to argue
abstemious - 1. eating and drinking in moderation; 2. characterized by abstinence or moderation
aby - to make amends; to atone; to pay a penalty
academe - 1. the academic life, community, or world; 2. a place in which instruction is given to students
accede - 1. to give one's consent, often at the insistence of another; concede; 2. to arrive at or come into an office or dignity (e.g., accede to the throne); 3. to become a party to an agreement or treaty
accessorial - 1. of or relating to an accessory; 2. of, relating to, or constituting an accession
accouchement - parturition
acedia [< Grk kedos, care, grief] - apathy, boredom; listlessness, torpor; Weltschmerz
acerbate - sourness or acidity of taste, character, or tone
achromatopsia (achromatopia) - defective ability to see colors
acicula - a slender, needlelike part or structure, such as the spines or bristles of some plants and animals and the crystals of certain minerals
acicular - having the shape of a needle (e.g., acicular crystals)
aciculate - 1. furnished with aciculae; 2. acicular; 3. marked with fine irregular streaks as if scratched by a needle
acnestis - a part of an animal's skin that the animal cannot reach to scratch itself -- usually the space between the shoulder blades
acousmatic - pertaining to sounds the source or cause of which is unseen
actinomorphic - of or pertaining to flowers with multiple axes of symmetry
actus reus (extenal element, objective element) - a physical act that attracts criminal sanctions; the guilty act that, when proved beyond a reasonable doubt along with the mens rea, produces criminal liability in common-law based criminal law
adduce - to cite as an example or means of proof in an argument
adequality [< Fermat] - [παρισὀτης (parisotes)] approximate equality
à deux - 1. privately or intimately with only two present (e.g., dined à deux); 2. involving two people, esp. in private (e.g., a cozy evening à deux)
adiabatic /ad i u bat' ik/ - (a) occurring without transfer of heat between a system and its surroundings
adjuvant - 1. (adj) serving to aid or contribute; auxiliary; 2. (adj) assisting in the prevention, amelioration, or cure of disease (e.g., adjuvant chemotherapy following surgery); 3. (n) an ingredient, as in a prescription or a solution, that modifies the action of the principal ingredient; 4. (n) something, as like a drug or method, that enhances the effectiveness of medical treatment; 5. (n) a substance, as like one added to a vaccine, enhancing the immune response to an antigen
ad litem [< L, for the suit, for the proceeding] - [law] an appointment of a part by a court to act in a lawsuit on behalf of another party -- for instance, a child or incapacitated adult
adscititious [< L, adsciscere, to admit, adopt < ad + scire]- (a) not inherent or essential; derived from something outside
adumbrate - 1. to give a sketchy outline of; 2. to prefigure indistinctly; foreshadow; 3. to disclose partially or guardedly
adunc [< L aduncus] - curved inward, hooked (usually as of a nose)
adventitious - 1. coming from another source and not inherent or innate; 2. arising or occurring sporadically or in an uncommon location
adventive - 1. (adj) not native to and not fully established in a new habitat or environment; 2. (n) an adventive organism
aeaeae (u 'ye yu) -
aeaeae artes - the magic arts; magic
aegis (ee' jis; ae' jis) - 1. a shield or breastplate emblematic of majesty that was associated with Zeus and Athena; 2.a) protection (e.g., under the aegis of the Constitution); b) controlling or conditioning influence (e.g., passed new laws under the aegis of national security); 3.a) auspices, sponsorship (e.g., under the auspices of the museum); b) control or guidance esp. by an individual, group, or system
aegrotat ('ee gro tat) [< L. aegrotare, to be ill < aeger, sick] - a medical certificate of illness excusing a student's sickness
affirming the consequent (fallacy of the converse) - a formal fallacy of inferring the converse from the original statement; (if P then Q) && Q therefore P
afflatus - a sudden rush of divine or poetic inspiration
affordance -
agate - [from Greek, achates] (n; often attributive) 1. a fine-grained variegated chalcedony; 2. sth fitted with agate; 3. type of approx. 5.5-point height; 4. condensed information (as advertisements or box scores) set especially in agate type
agathokakological ?
aggiornamento - (n) the process of bringing an institution or organization up to date; modernization. 
agita ?
agitprop - 1. political propaganda, esp. favoring communism and disseminated through literature, drama, art, or music; 2. a bureau in charge of agitation and propaganda on behalf of communism
aglet - 1. the plain or ornamental tag covering the ends of a lace or point; 2. any of various ornamental studs, cords, or pins worn on clothing
agnotology - the study of culturally induced ignorance or doubt -- particularly the publication of inaccurate or misleading scientific data
agoge - (n) the rigorous education-and-training regimen mandated for all male Spartan citizens (firstborn sons of ruling houses excepted)
agraffe - 1. a hooking clasp on armor and clothing; 2. a cramp iron for holding stones together in building; 3. wire mesh that secures a wine bottle's cork
agrestral -
aide-mémoire -
aiguillette (aglet) (ay gwi let') - a shoulder cord worn by designated military aides
ait (eit) - an island in a river, esp. the Thames River
akubra - an Australian brand of bush hat
Albion -
Alderson disk (godwheel) -
alec [< L alec (halec, hallec), fish sauce] - 1. a herring; 2. a sauce or relish made from small herring or anchovies
Allen charge (dynamite charge; hammer charge) - a jury instruction intended to prevent a hung jury by encouraging jurors in the minority to reconsider. (Allen's holding is based upon the Supreme Court's supervisory power over the federal courts. Thus, it is not binding on state courts. Approximately half of the U.S. states prohibit Allen charges on state law grounds.)
Algernon principle - any simple major enhancement to human intelligence is a net evolutionary disadvantage
algocracy - a system of algorithmic regulation, one in which our decisions are 'nudged' in paraticular directions by data-processing algorithms
algor mortis -
aliment -
allocution (allocutus) - a formal statement made to the court by the defendant who has been found guilty, prior to being sentenced; in plea bargains, an allocution may be required of the defendant; the defendant explicitly admits specifically and in detail to what he or she did and for what reason, in exchange for a reduced sentence
allothetic - relating to navigation models that are centered in people or places other than oneself
almacantar -
altercation -
alveolate -
amaranthine [< Gr, amarantos, everlasting] - everlasting; immortal
ambuscade -
a mensa et thoro [< L, from table and bed] - pertaining to a legal separation that is not a legal divorce 
amorphous solid -
amphiboly -
amphigaory - a nonsensical poem
amuse-bouche - a small complimentary appetizer offered at some restaurants
anabiosis - revival after apparent death; reanimation after a coma even when vital signs are imperceptible
anacreontic - 1. (adj) jovial; festive; 2. (adj) pertaining to the Greek poet Anacreon and his manners; 3. (n) a short lyrical piece that is about love and wine
anacrusis (pl. anacruses) [< Grk, pushing up] - 1. (poetry) a set of extrametrical syllables at the beginning of a verse; 2. (music) (also 'pickup note') a note or sequence of notes that precedes the first downbeat in a bar; 3. (academic publishing) an introductory idea presented between the abstract and the proper introduction
anadiplosis - the repetition of the last word of a preceding clause or setence at the beginning of the next
anankastic conditional - a grammatical construction of the form 'if you want X, you have to do Y'
anaplastology [< Grk, ana, again, anew + plastos, made, formed] - a branch of medicine that pertains to rehabilitation with prosthetics
anaptyxix (svarabhakti) - the addition of a vowel
anatine -
andouille ?
anent [< OEng, 'on efen', alongside < efen, even] - about or concerning
anglish [blue-eyed English, Ander-Saxon] -
anguine -
anisodactyly - three digits forward, one back
anodyne - 1. (adj) capable of soothing or eliminating pain; 2. (adj) relaxing (e.g., anodyne novels about country life); 3. (n) a medicine that relieves pain
anoetic - 1. unthinkable; 2. not subject to conscious attention; having an indefinite, relatively passive, conscious being; characteristic of the margin of consciousness
anosognsosia - a deficit of self-awareness
Anschluss - annexation or unification
anserine -
ansible [by Ursula Le Guin] - a fictional machine capable of instantaneous or superluminal communication
Antaean - having indefatigable strength while maintaining contact with the ground
Anthropocene -
antigropelos -
antihelix - a curved prominence of cartilage parallel with and in front of the helix of the pinna; it separates the two crura antihelicis (sp?), between which is a triangular depression called the fossa triangularis
antimeria -
Antikythera mechanism - an ancient analog computer designed to predict astronomical positions and eclipses; recovered in 1900-01 from teh Antikythera shipwreck
antilogy -
antiprosopoeia - (n)
antiquark - has one of three anti-colors {anti-red, anti-green, anti-blue} [respectively, cyan, magenta, yellow]
antitragus - a small tubercle on the pinna, located just above the earlobe, pointing anteriorly, and separated from the tragus by the intertragic notch
antrustion - a vassal or voluntary follower of Frankish princes in the enterprises
aphesis - apheresis of unstressed vowels
apheresis (aphæresis) [< Grk apo, away + haireo, to take] - the loss of one or more sounds from the beginning of a word; esp. the loss of an unstressed vowel
aphthong - a letter or combination of letters employed in word's written representation but not pronounced
apocope - the loss of one or more sounds from the end of a word, especially the loss of an unstressed vowel
apogee -
apogogic- proving indirectly, by showing the absurdity, or impossibility, of the contrary
apologue -
apophasis (paralipsis, occupatio, praeteritio, preterition, cataphasis, antiphrasis, parasiopesis) - a rhetorical device wherein the speaker brings up a subject by denying that it should be brought up
apophatic theology (<Gk, apophasis, denial) - negative theology; a theology that attempts to describe God by negation
apophony - ablaut
apothetatae - a site near Mt. Taygetus where unfit infants were left to die of exposure
apparatchik - 1. a member of a communist apparat; a USSR functionary; 2. an unquestionably loyal subordinate, esp. of a political leader or organization
appurtenant - 1. constituting a legal accompaniment; 2. auxiliary, accessory
apricity - the warmth of the Sun in winter
apsis - a point of greatest or least distance of a body in an elliptic orbit about a larger body [e.g., aphelion, perihelion, apogee, perigee, pericynthion]
aptonym - a name that identifies but also aptly describes an individual
arabesque - 1. (n) a ballet position in which the dancer bends forward while standing on one straight leg with the arm extended forward and the other arm and leg extended backward; 2. (n) a complex, ornate design of intertwined floral, foliate, and geometric figures; 3. (n) [Music] An ornate, whimsical composition especially for piano 
arachibutyrophobia - aversion to the state such that peanut butter adheres to the roof of one's mouth
arbejdsglæde [< Danish] - happiness at work
arcana -
archimedean spiral -
Archimedes palimpsest - a parchment codex palimpsest originally by Archimedes of Syracuse, overwritten by 13th-century monks, and containing 'The Method of Mechanical Theorems' (a description of differential and integral calculus)
aretology - (n) 1. a narrative about a divine figure's miraculous deeds; 2. a catalogue of a person's virtues
argot -
arithemetic progression - an arithmetic sequence
arobase - the at-sign
arrogate - 1. to take or claim for oneself without right; to appropriate (e.g., presidents have arrogated the power to declare war); 2. to ascribe on behalf of another in an unwanted manner
asana - any of various bodily positions assumed in yogic exercise
ashram -
aspartate -
asphalia -
assertation - an assertion, statement of opinion
asemic writing -
assortativity (assortative mixing) - a preference for a network's nodes to attach to others that are similar in some way; a bias in favor of connections between network nodes with similar characteristics
asthenopia (as thu no' pee u) - weakness or rapid fatigue of the eyes often accompanied by pain and headache
astronomical unit [au] - a unit of length that is approximately the observed length of the semi-major axis of the earth's elliptical orbit around the sun
atopy - a predisposition toward developing allergic hypersensitivity
at that - 1. in addition; besides; moreover; (e.g., lived in a small room, and a small room at that) 2. regardless of what has been said or implied (e.g., a long shot, but she just might win at that)
attorney-in-fact - one (an attorney or anyone?) who has power of attorney
aufheben [Hegel; < Grm, to cancel, keep, pick up] - the result of the conservative force of a thesis and the transformative force of the corresponding antithesis
aureate -
aureation -
auricle - pinna
automaticity - the ability to do things without occupying the mind with the low-level details required, allowing it to become an automatic response pattern or habit.
autopoiesis - the capability of a system to reproduce and maintain itself; the reproduction of a such system
autour - (n)
autotelic - 1. containing its own meaning or purpose; 2. deriving meaning and purpose from within; 3. not motivated by anything beyond itself; thematically self-contained
avunculize - to act or behave as an uncle
ayot (ai' ut; eit) - a little island, esp. in a river or lake
backmasking - (n) the reversal of recorded sound
baculum - a bone found in the penis of many placental mammals
bae - (n) one's romantic partner (used endearingly)
bafflement -
baguio ?
baldric -
baleful -
ballast -
ballottement - 1. a method of diagnosing pregnancy, characterized by using a finger to feel whether a fetus moves away and returns; 2. an increased amount of fluid in the suprapatellar pouch of the knee
ban (harley, dit) - a base-10 logarithmic unit that measures information entropy, that was devised by Alan Turing and I.J. Good, that predates Claude Shannon's use of 'bit' by at least eight years, and that was replaced with the hartely by the International System of Quantities
Banburismus - a cryptanalytic technique developed by Alan Turing that uses sequential conditional probability to infer information about likely Enigma settings; comparisons of pairs of encrypted messages were made with cards printed in Banbury, England [cf. Scritchmus]
bandeau - 1. a band for the hair; 2. a brassiere, esp. when narrow or strapless
baneful -
banlieu - the outskirts of a city
bannimus - a form of expulsion of any individual from the University of Oxford, by putting the proctorial edict up in some public place
bannition - (obsolete) the act of expulsion
baraita -
barathrum (ba 'rath rum) - an abyss; an insatiable person
bard - 1.a) a tribal poet-singer skilled in composing and reciting verses on heroes and their deeds; b) a composer, singer, or declaimer of epic or heoric verse; 2. poet
bariatrics - the branch of medicine that studies the causes, prevention, and treatment of obesity
barm -
barmecide - an insincere benefactor; one who holds out illusory offers or who promises but does not deliver
barratry -
baryon - (n) a hadron comprising three quarks
barytone [< Grk, barys, heavy, low] - a word in ancient Greek that has no accent on the last syllable
bascule -
basis point - a 100th of a percentage point
bask -
bass ostinato - a type of variation form in which a bassline or harmonic pattern is repeated as the basis of a piece underneath variations [riff, vamp]
bastide (pronunciation : ?) - a mansion in Provence
batard - a loaf of bread similar in shape to a baguette but shorter
batrachian [Grk, batrachos, frog] - 1. amphibian; frog-like; toad-like
battology - the continual reiteration of the same words or phrases in speech or writing
Baumol-Tobin model - an economic model of the transactions demand for money (developed independently by Baumol and Tobin)
bavin - 1. a bundle of wood or twigs which may be used in broom making; 2. a fagot bound with only one band; 3. impure limestone
BCD (binary-coded decimal) - a class of binary encodings of decimal numbers such that each decimal digit is represented by a fixed number of bits (e.g., the '8421' scheme and the 'Excess-3' scheme)
beatmatching - pitch shifting or timestretching an upcoming track to match its tempo to that of the currently playing track
beef-witted - having an inactive brain because of eating too much beef
befog -
begat - an element of a lineage, esp. of a lineage given in the Bible
begem - to adorn with or as if with gems
begettal - the act or fact of being begotten
behoof -
bel canto - (n) a style of operatic singing characterized by full, even tones and a brilliant display of vocal technique
belie -
bellibone - a woman both beautiful and virtuous
bellum omnium contra omnes [< Hobbes] -
bene kedoshim ? descendents of martyrs
Benedictdine rule -
Bereshit [< Hebrew, in the beginning] - the book of Genesis [c.f. 'incipit']
berserker - a self-replicating spacecraft designed to discover and exterminate life
beset -
besot - (v) to muddle or stupefy, as with alcoholic liquor or infatuation
bespeak - (v) 1. to hire, engage, or claim beforehand; 2. to speak to (so/sth) with formality; to address; 3. to request (eg - to bespeak a favor); 4a) to indicate, signify (eg - her performance bespeaks considerable practice); 4b) to show beforehand; foretell. Exs: 1) Her newest album bespeaks a great talent for writing songs. 2) They bespoke the rental car weeks in advance.
besprent - sprinkled over
besprinkle [past tense: besprent] -
bhakti - [Hinduism] a path to achievign salvation through loving devotion to a particular deity, open to all persons irrespective of sex or caste
biastophilia [< Grk, biastes, rape] - a paraphilia pertaining to assault on unconsenting individuals
biblioklept - a compulsive book thief
bibulous -
bifunctor (binary functor) - a functor whose domain is a product category
bight -
bikeshedding - (Parkinson's law of triviality) the argument that orgnizations give disproportional weight to trivial matters
bilge - 1. the bulging part of a cask or barrel; 2. a) the part of the underwater body of a ship between the flat of the bottom and the vertical topsides; b) the lowest point of a ship's inner hull; 3. stale or worthless remarks or ideas
bilgewater - water that collects in the bilge of a ship
billet -
biliary -
bilge -
bilious - 1. of, relating to, or containing bile; biliary; 2. characterized by an excess secretion of bile
bill of lading -
bis - encore
bivouac - 1. any encampment, esp. temporary, usually without tents or covering; 2. (dated) the watch of a whole army by night, when in danger of surprise or attack
blæ - dark blue or bluish gray; lead-colored
blee - 1. (rare or poetic) color or hue (e.g., with beak of yellow blee); 2. complexion; 3. form, texture, consistency (e.g., through a spongious kind of blee); 4. general resemblance, likeness; aspect; appearnance (e.g., That boy has a strong blee of his father.)
bleeful - full of blee; colorful; radiant; cheerful (e.g., Perhaps he ate a bleeful scone.)
blemish -
blended learning - a formal education program in which a student learns at least in part through delivery of content and instruction via digital and online media with some element of student control over time, place, path or pace
bliki - a wiki-blog
blin - (obsolete or archaic) 1. to cease from; 2. to stop, desist
blindworm - slowworm; A limbless lizard (Anguis fragilis) of Europe, western Asia, and northern Africa, having a smooth snakelike body and feeding chiefly on slugs. Also called blindworm
blunderbuss -
bly - (dialectical) likeness; resemblance; aspect; blee; species; character
bocage -
boffin -
boggart -
boi - a male bottom (i.e., a submissive male partner), defined not by junior age but by his obediant role, esp. when that implies his being subject to punishments like spanking
Bokononism - a religion invented by Kurt Vonnegut and based on harmless untruths that serve to effect peace of mind
Boltzmann brain - a hypothesized self-aware entity which arises due to random fluctuations out of a state of chaos
bombastic -
bombe - an electromechanical device used by British cryptologists to decipher Engima
bombilate -
boniface -
boriqua - 
borborygmus - a rumbling or gurgling noise made by the movement of fluid and gas in the intestines
boscade -
bosk -
boson [< Bose]
bouffant -
boyar (boyard) [< Rus boyarin < Turkick baylar, plural of 'bay', rich, gentleman] - a member of a class of higher Russian nobility that until the time of Peter I headed the civil and military administration of the country and participated in an early duma
Bracewell probe - an autonomous interstellar space probe dispatched to communiate with alien civilizations
bracing - invigorating or refreshing; strengthening
brad - a binary radian
brainchild -
brandy [< brandywine < Dutch brandewijn, burned wine] - an alcoholic liquor distilled from wine or fermented fruit juice, a brand of such, or a glass of such
bravo - villain; desperado; a hired assassin
bravura -
bream - (vt) to clean (a wooden ship's hull) by applying heat to soften the pitch and then scraping
breechloader -
brevet -
bricolage -
brickbat -
brio -
brisure - (n) inconspicuous heraldic marks (smaller than charges) on coats of arms placed on the fess-point or in-chief
bromide - a commonplace remark or notion; a platitude
brontide -
brougham (bruem; brue' um; brom; bro' um) - 1. a closed four-wheeled carriage with an open driver's seat in front; 2. an automobile with an open driver's seat; 3. an electrically powered automobile resembling a coupé
bruit -
brummagem [< Birmingham, where counterfeit coins were made] - 1. (a) cheap and showy; meretricious; 2. a brummagem item; [possibly 3. artificial; counterfeit]
BTCbug -
bucket of stuff - a container of self-reconfigurable robotic modules that adapt to accomplish generic tasks or chores; use of such self-reconfigurable modules
buckra - [contemptuous term] a white man
budgerigar - an Australian parrot
budtender - a person whose job is to serve customers in a cannabis dispensary or shop
buffet froid - a meal set out on a buffet at which guests help themselves
bugout bag -
bulwark -
bumptious - loudly, rudely, annoyingly proud or confident; presumptuously, obtusely, noisily self-assertive
bundling (tarrying) - a traditional practice of wrapping one person in a bed accompanied by another, usually as a part of courting behavior
bunya - a dome-shaped Australian coniferous tree
burin - 1. a chisel with a sharp point, used for engraving; 2. a prehistoric flint tool
burl -
burlesque -
busk -
butyraceous - (a) resembling butter in appearance, consistency, or chemical properties.
cacodemonize -
cacography - (n)
cacozelia [< Grk κᾰκοζηλία, bad imitation, affectation] - (rhetoric) 1. a stylistic affectation of diction, such as throwing in foreign words to appear learned; 2. bad taste in words or selection of metaphor; either to make the facts appear worse or to disgust the auditors
cack-handed -
cadency - (n) any system way of distinguishing otherwise identical coats of arms belonging to members of the same family
cadenza [< Ital, cadence] - 1. an improvized or previously composed ornamental passage; 2. a portion of a concerto in which the soloist plays unaccompanied and in free time
cadre - 
calabash -
calefacient - a medicinal agent producing a feeling of warmth
california widow - a married woman whose husband is away from her for any extended period
caliph -
calligyniaphobia -
Calliope [< Grk, kalliope, beautiful-voiced] - the muse of epic poetry; daughter of Zeus and Mnemosyne and mother of Orpheus and Linus
callipygian -
callipygous -
callisteia - prizes for beauty
callomania -
callow -
calotte - 1. a skullcap, esp. one worn by Roman Catholic priests; 2.  a concavity in the form of a niche or cup, serving to reduce the apparent height of an alcove or chapel
calumniate -
calque [< Fr, calquer, to trace, copy] - 1. a neologism that comprises translations of the roots or morphemes of a word of a different language; 2. to coin a such word
calvados - an apple brandy made in Normandy, France, or a glass of this spirit
cambion - the offspring of an incubus and a human
cancrizans ('kang kri zanz) [< L., cacrizare, to move backwards] - (adj) moving backwards; esp. of a musical canon, repeating a theme backwards
canon - 1. a member of certain bodies subject to ecclesiastical rule
cant (cryptolect) - a jargon or argot of a group, often employed to exclude or mislead others
cantle -
capacious -
captious - (a) 1. marked by a disposition to find and point out trivial faults; intended to entrap or confuse, as in an argument
caravanserai -
carbine -
carfax [< L., quadrifurcus] - a place where foru roads meet; an intersection of main roads at the center of a town
carmine -
caruncle -
caruncula - 
Casaubon, Edward - a character of George Eliot's 'Middlemarch', who spends his life in a futile attempt to find a comprehensive explanatory framework for the whole of mythology to be described in a book called 'The Key to All Mythologies'; he is a scholarly clergyman who is insecure and uncertain about his own abilities; he marries Dorothea Brooke because he thinks she is completely submissive and worshipful but her true stubborn independence frustrates him and is interpreted as criticism
cassiopeium -
cassoulet - a casserole of white beans baked with herbs and meat
castell - a human tower formed traditionally in festivals in Catalonia
catachresis - (n) 
cataphatic theology -
catchment -
categorification - the process of replacing set-theoretic theorems by category-theoretic analogues; when done successfully, replaces sets by categories, functions with functors, and equations by natural isomorphisms of functors satisfying additional properties cathedra [< Gr, seat] - the seat of a bishop
caudillo -
cause célèbre -
causerie - 
causeway -
cavitate - 1. (vi) to form cavities or bubbles; 2. (vt) to cavitate in
cavort -
centipawn - a unit of chess strategic value such that 100 centipawns are equivalent to the average strategic value of a random single pawn
cenobitic [cenobiac] -
cenobium
cerumen (se rue' men) [Note: accent is on 2nd syllable.] [< L., cera, wax < Grk., keros, wax][< L., cera, wax < Grk., keros, wax]  - earwax
ceruminous -
cestuan -
chaebol [< Kor, chae, wealth, property + pol, faction, clan] - a South-Korean form of business conglomerate
chalet -
chapeau - (interjection) an indication of laudatory respect
chartjunk - unnecessary or distracting visual elements included in charts and graphs
chautauqua (shu 'ta kwu) - (n) an adult-education movement in the U.S. in the late 19th century
cheironomoy - the use of hand signals to direct vocal music performance
Chekhov's gun - a dramatic principle that requires every element in a narrative be necessary and irreplaceable, and that everything else be removed
chela -
chelation - a chemical process to remove metal ions from a solution, esp. to counter poisoning by heavy metals
chersonese (kur' su neez) [< Grk, khersos, dry (land) + nesos, island] - 1. a poetic or rhetorical word for 'peninsula'; 2. the Thracian chersonese
Chesterton fence - the principle that one should assume that a current state is locally optimal or at least nearly so unless evidence to the contrary exists [don't remvove a fence until its purpose is known]
cheval de frise - 1. an obstacle made of wood with spikes for use against cavalry; 2. protective row of spikes or broken glass set into the top of a wall to prevent intrusion; 3. the jagged edge of 18th-century women's clothing
chevauchée [< Fr, promenade or horse charge] - a raiding method of medieval warfare for weakening the enemy, focusing mainly on wreaking havoc, burning and pillaging enemy territory, in order to reduce the productivity of a region; as opposed to siege warfare or wars of conquest
chiaus ?
chicanery -
chilver - a female lamb
chimera -
Chinese-restaurant process - 
chiral -
choropleth map [< Grk χώρο, area, region; πλήθος, multitude] - a thematic map in which areas are shaded or patterned in proportion to the measurement of a statistical variable
chordal graph - a graph such that each of its cycles of four or more vertices has a chord (i.e., an edge that is not part of the cycle but connects two vertices of the cycle)
chrematist -
chrestomathy [< Gk, chrestos, useful + mathein, to know] - a collection of selected literary passages, usually to aid instructions
chrematophobia -
chroneme - a basic, theoretical unit of sound that distinguishes words by duration
chyron ? (card at a talk show ?)
circumambient -
circumlocution -
circumstanced -
clangor -
clapperclaw ? to verbally abuse
claro -
clawback - (n) 1. a rule that permits a party to take back evidentiary materials that were mistakenly turned over to the other party but to which the other party would not have been entitled; 2. money that a party is entitled to keep under one tax provision but which is taken from them by another tax provision; 3. any recovery of a performance-related payback based on discovery that the performance was not genuine (i.e., a special contractual clause to secure an option for an employer to limit bonuses in case of catastrophic shifts in business)
clinomania - the obsessive desire to lie down
cliodynamics [< Clio, muse of history] - the study and mathematical modeling of temporally varying processes
clitellum (pl: clitella) [< L, clitellum, packsaddle] - a swollen, glandular, saddle-like region in the epidemis of certain annelid worms (the earthworm e.g.) that secretes a viscous fluid to form a cocoon for eggs
cloche - 1. a glass covering for garden plants to prevent frost damage; 2. a bell-shaped women's hat
clock - a method devised by Polish cryptologist Jerzy Różycki to facilitate decrypting Enigma ciphers and extended by Alan Turing into the Banburismus technique
clonk -
clotted language - (n) [perhaps] blue language
clusivity -
coadunation [< L ad + unare] - the union (as of dissimilar substances) in one body or mass
coaita ?
cobelligerency -
cobordant - relating to manifolds of the same dimension such that their union is the complete boundary of a third manifold
cobordism - the union of two cobordant manifolds
cockade - a rosette worn in a hat as an office or party badge
cockaigne - a land in medieval myth: a land of plenty, luxury, and idleness
cockle [< L. cochylium, mussel] - 1. any bivalve mollusk of the genus Cardium, 2. any of various allied or similar mollusks; 3. the shell of a cockle; 4. a wrinkle; pucker; 5. a small, crisp candy of sugar and flour, bearing a motto; 6. (vi) to contract into wrinkles; pucker (e.g., this paper cockles easily); 7. (vi) to rise in short, irregular waves; ripple (e.g., the waves cockled along the shore); 8. (vt) to cause to wrinkle, pucker, or ripple (e.g., the wind cockled the water)
cockleshell - 1. a shell of a cockle; 3. [nautical] any light or frail vessel
codex - a manuscript volume, esp. of a classic work or the Scriptures; a book comprising multiple sheets of paper, vellum, or papyrus that has hand-written content and is usually stacked and bound by fixing one edge with thick covers; [developed by the Romans and gradually replaced scrolls]
codicology - the scholarly study of codex bookbinding
cofferdam - 1. A temporary watertight enclosure that is pumped dry to expose the bottom of a body of water so that construction, as of piers, may be undertaken.  2. A watertight chamber attached to the side of a ship to facilitate repairs below the water line.
cogent - 1. having power to compel or constrain (e.g., cogent forces); 2. a) appealing forcibly to the mind or reason; convincing (e.g., cogent evidence); b) pertinent; relevant (e.g., a cogent analysis)
cognomen -
collatz sequences (hailstone sequences, wondrous sequences) - { e.g., 6, 3, 10, 5, 16, 8, 4, 2, 1 }
colligative -
collimate [< L., collimare < collineare, to render straight] - to make (as light rays) parallel
colophon [< Grk, kolophon, summit, finishing touch] - a publisher's emblem or inscription
colorant -
colorato - (music) 1. the ornamentation of music written for the voice with florid passages, esp. trills and runs; 2. vocal music characterized by florid ornamental passages; 3. a singer, esp. a soprano, specializing in such ornamentation
colposinquanoia -
comestible [< L, com + edere, to eat] - edible
commissary -
comital -
comity -
commensurable - 1. having a commong measure; specifically: divisible without remainder by a common unit; 2. commensurate
companology ?
comparative reduplication - an English use of reduplication to indicate increasing intensity (e.g., the apple looked redder and redder)
compeer - 1. a person of equal status or rank; a peer; 2. a comrade, companion, or associate
compere - 1. (n) the master of ceremonies, as of a television entertainment program or variety show; 2. (vt) to serve as master of ceremonies for; 3. (vi) to serve as a master of ceremonies
complacent - 1. marked by self-satisfaction, esp. when accompanied by unawareness of actual deficiencies; 2. complaisant; inclined to please or oblige; 3. unconcerned
complaisant - 1. marked by an inclination to please or oblige; 2. tending to consent to others' wishes
compleat (kum pleet') - having all necessary or desired elements or skills
complect - (archaic) (vt) 1. to join by weaving; 2. to embrace
complex network - a graph (network) with non-trivial topological features—features that do not occur in simple networks such as lattices or random graphs but often occur in real graphs. (Such features include a heavy tail in the degree distribution, a high clustering coefficient, assortativity or disassortativity among vertices, community structure, and hierarchical structure. In the case of directed networks these features also include reciprocity, triad significance profile and other features.)
comport - 1. (explicitly reflexive verb?) to conduct oneself or to behave int a particular manner (e.g.: comport yourself with dignity); 2. (vi) [+ 'with'] to agree, correspond, or harmonize (e.g.: a foreign policy that comports with the principles of democracy)
computronium -
comstockery ?
conceit - 1.a) a result of mental activity; b) individual opinion; c) favorable opinion, especially excessive appreciation of one's own worth or virtue; 2. a fancy item or trifle; 3.a) a fanciful idea; b) an elaborate or strained metaphor; c) use or presence of such conceits in poetry; d) an organizing theme or concept (e.g., found his conceit for the film early)
concertina - 1. a codex comprising a single long sheet alternately folded in stages so that it might collapse like a concertina musical instrument
concordance - 1. an alphabetical index of the principal words in a book or the works of an author with their immediate contexts; 2. concord; agreement
concupiscent -
condottiero (also condottiere; pl. condottieri) - a leader of the professional military free companies contracted by the Italian city-states and the papacy during the late Middle Ages
confab -
conglobate - 1. (a) formed into a ball; 2 (vt, vi) to collect into a ball
conglobe - 1. to conglobate
connascence - 1. the simultaneous birth of multiple things; 2. the act of growing together; 3. [software development] tight coupling
consign - 1. to give over to the care of another; entrust; 2. to turn over permanently to another's charge or to a lasting condition; commit irrevocably; 3. to deliver (merchandise, e.g.) for custody or sale
consignment -
constabulary - 1. the organized body of constables of a particular district or country; 2. an armed police force organized on military lines but distinct from the regular army 
constable - a public official whose job is similar to that of a police officer but who is elected or appointed rather than hired
constellate - 1. to unite in a cluster; 2. to set or adorn with or as if with constellations
constupration -
contactless - relating ot or involving technologies that allow a smart card, mobile phone, etc, to contact wirelessly to an electronic reader, typically in order to make a payment
contemptible -
contrarian -
contrastive focus reduplication - an English use of reduplication to contrast between figurative and literal interprations (e.g., Is that carrot cheesecake or carrot cake-cake?)
contrection -
contronym - (e.g., 'cleave')
conure - an informal class of parakeets that are found in the western hemisphere and that have long tails and small beaks
cooee ?
coprolalia - 
copse -
copypasta - text that has been copied and pasted, often repeatedly and indiscrimately as by spammers or obsessive persons
coquille [pl: coquilles] [< Fr, shell < L. conchylium, mussel] - 1. any of various seafood or chicken dishes baked with a sauce and usually served in a scallop shell or a shell-shaped serving dish; 2. the cooking utensil for baking such dishes, usually a scallop shell or small casserole resembling a shell; 3. a cooking utensil, filled with charcoal, for roasting meat on a spit; 4. the shell of an escargot; 5. [fencing] a bell-shaped hand guard on a foil
coracle - a small boat of wickerwork covered with a waterproof layer, often of animal skin or canvas
cornerstone -
coronis -
corpsbruder -
coterminous -
cotillion - 1. a ballroom dance for couples that resembles the quadrille; 2. an elaborate dance with frequent changing of partners; 3. a formal ball; 4. a coming-of-age party meant to present girls to the community for courtship
coulis [first known use: 1978] - a thick sauce made with pureed vegetable or fruit and often used as a garnish
coulrophobia - fear of clowns
coupé (kue' pei; often kuep) - 1. a four-wheeled closed horse-drawn carriage for two persons inside with an outside seat for the driver in front; 2. a two-door automobile often seating only two persons
coxa - 1. the basal segment of a limb of various arthropods; the first or proximal segment of the leg of insects, joining the leg to the body; 2. the hip or hip joint
coxal - pertaining to coxas (coxae?)
coxcomb -
crackbrain - 1. (a) insane, idiotic, or crazy; 2. (n) a foolish or eccentric person
crapulence - 1. sickness casued by excessive eating or drinking; 2. excessive indulgence; intemperance
crapulous [< L, crapula, intoxication] - 1. characterized by gross excess in drinking or eating; 2. suffering or ill from such excess
crasis - 1. one's constitution; the balance of humors in a person's body; 2. a mixture or combination; 3. the contraction of a vowel or dipthon at the end of a word with a vowel or diphthon at the end start of the following word
crèche - 1. a representation of the christan nativity scene; 2. a foundling hospital; 3. a group of young animals gathered in one place for care and protection
credo -
creepypasta - a short horror story distributed across the internet in the manner of copypasta
crib -
cri de coeur -
Croesus -
croque-en-bouche (croquembouche) - a French dessert made by piling profiteroles (choux pastry balls) and other sweets in a tall conical shape, then pouring caramel over them to hold them in place
cropper - 1. a person who cultivates or harvests a crop; 2. a cutting machine for removing the heads from castings and ingots; 3. a machined for shearing the nap from cloth; 4. a heavy fall; a tumble; 5. a disastrous failure; a fiasco
crotchet - 1.a) a highly individual and usually eccentric opinion or preference; b) a peculiar trick or device; 2. a quarter note
croup (cruep) - 1. the top of the rump of a horse; 2. an infectious illness of the larynx
crudités [< L, crūdus, raw] - traditional french appetizers comprising sliced or whole raw vegetables, which are sometimes dipped in a vinaigrette or other dipping sauce
cryosphere - the surfaces of the earth that are frozen
cryptid -
cryptomorphism - nonobvious formal equivalence between mathematical objects
cryptophasia -
cuirass -
culverin -
cunicular -
curglaff - the shock felt when one first plunges into cold water
curio - a curious or unusual object of art or piece of bric-a-brac
curse of knowledge - a cognitive bias that leads better informed persons to find it difficult to think about problems from the perspective of lesser informed persons
curtilage - a piece of ground (as a yard or courtyard) within the fence surrounding a house
cymatics [< Grk κυμα, wave, billow] - the study of sound by way of visible manifestations of vibration
cynarctomarchy - bear-baiting with a dog
cynosure (sai'/si' nu shur) [< Grk kynos oura, dog's tail] - 1. (capitalized) the northern constellation Ursa Minor, or the North Star; 2. one that serves to direct or guide (e.g., with an unwarvering commitment to equal rights for all as his only cynosure; that company is the cynosure for anyone wishing to make it in the music business); 3. a center of attraction or attention (e.g., turned an eyesore into a cynsoure)
D20 - (n) heavy water or deuterium oxide
dacha -
daymare -
dapper -
dasypygal -
dastard -
daysure ?
dead letter -
dead instrument -
deadpan -
deaister ?
dealate -
death mask -
debuccalization -
decry -
deeryard - a place where deer gather for wintering
defease - to forfeit; to discharge; free from; acquit of
defeasible - capable of being annulled or invalidated
deicide - destruction or killing of a god
del - nabla; the differential operator (∂) 
delenda -
dell -
démarche ?
demesne - 1. legal possession of land as one's own; 2. manorial land actually possessed by the lord and not held by tenants; 3.a) the land attached to a mansion; b) landed property; estate; c) region; territory; 4. realm, domain
democratic deficit -
demoralize -
dentil - one of a series of small rectangular blocks projecting from a molding or beneath a cornice
denude -
denying the antecedent (fallacy of the inverse) - the formal fallacy of inferring the inverse from the original statement; i.e., (if P then Q) && ~P therefore ~Q
depilation -
deposition - the reverse process of sublimation
de rigueur - 
dermatillomania -
desaparecido - one of the people who disappeared durign the 1976-1983 military rule in Argentina, presumed to have been killed by members of the regime
desiderata -
desiderate - (vt) to wish to have or see happen; to feel the lack of or need for; long for; miss
despite (di spait') - (n) 1. the feeling or attitude of despising someone or something; contempt; 2. malice; spite; 3.a) an act showing contempt or defiance; b) detriment; disadvantage
desultory - 1. having no set plan; haphazard or random; 2. moving spastically or jumping; disconnected (e.g., a desultory speech)
detritivore -
deuteron - (n) the nucleus of deuterium
diaconate -
diacope - the repetition of a word or phrase with intervening words [e.g., 'In times like these, it helps to recall that there have always been times like these.']
diaeresis - 1. a diacritical mark; the break in a verse caused by the coincidence of the end of a foot and the end of a line; hiatus
diaglyph [< Grk, dia, through + glyphein, to carve] - an intaglio
diaphysis -
diapsid [< Grk di + hapsis, loop, arch] - of, relating to, or including reptiles (as the crocodiles) with two pairs of temporal openings in the skull; of a group of amniote tetrapods (including crocodiles, lizards, snakes, tutatura, birds, and dinosaurs) that developed two holes (temporal fenestrae) in each side of their skulls about 300 m.y.a. during the late Carboniferous period
diaresis -
dibur hamathil [< Hebrew, 'the beginning phrase'] - an incipit
dicastery -
dictum - 1. a statement or well-known remark that expresses an important idea or rule; a noteworthy statement: as (a) a formal pronouncement of a principle, proposition, or opinion; (b) an observation intended or regarded as authoritative; 2. a judge's expression of opinion on a point other than the precise issue involved in determining a case
dictum de omni et nullo (the maxim of all and none) - the principle that whatever is affirmed or denied of a whole kind K may be affirmed or denied (respectively) of any subkind of K
dictum proprium - a personal or individual dictum that is expressed by a judge who delivers an opinion that is not necessarily concurred in by the whole court and that is not essential to the disposition of the case
didapper -
diegesis - a style of fiction storytelling which presents an interior view of a world and is that world itself experienced by the characters in situations and events of the narrative telling, recounting, as opposed to showing, enacting [c.f. mimesis]
diegetic music - source music
diesis - 1. double dagger; (music theory) 2. an accidental; 3. a small musical interval (a comma), usually defined as the difference between an octave and three justly tuned major thirds (approx. 41.06 cents)
differentia -
differintegral - a combined differentiation/integration operator
digitigrade -
dignotation -
diktat - 1. a harsh, unilaterally imposed settlement with a defeated party; 2. an authoritative or dogmatic statement or decree
diluvium [< L, diluere, to wash away] - glacial drift
dipnoous ?
dirigisme - economic planning and control by the state; an economic system where the state exerts a strong directive influence over investment; a capitalist economy that assigns a strong directive, as opposed to a merely regulatory, role to the state
disfix - a subtractive morpheme
disjecta membra - surviving fragments of ancient poetry, manuscripts , etc. including ancient pottery
disport - 1. (vi) to amuse oneself in a light, frolicsome manner; 2. (explicitly reflexive verb?) to amuse (oneself) in a light, frolicsome manner; 3. (vt) to display 
disquisition - a long speech or written report on a subject; a formal inquiry into or discussion of a subject
disseminate -
dissortativity - a bias in favor of connections between dissimilar nodes
distal -
dithyramb - 1. A frenzied, impassioned choric hymn and dance of ancient Greece in honor of Dionysus. 2. An irregular poetic expression suggestive of the ancient Greek dithyramb. 3. A wildly enthusiastic speech or piece of writing.
dobbin -
docent - 1. a teacher or lecturer at some universities who is not a regular faculty member; 2. a lecturer or tour guide in a museum
Dogberryism - malapropism
dogsbody - a drudge who is obliged to do menial work
dog's breakfast - an unappealing mixture; a disorderly situation; a mess
dog-whistle politics - political messaging employing coding langauge that appears to mean one thing to the general population but has additional meaning to a targeted subgroup
dol - a unit of measurement for pain
Dolgopolsky list - a word list that was compiled by Aharon Dolgopolsky in 1964 and that contains 15 lexical items that have the most semantic stability -- i.e., words that are the least likely to be replaced by other words as a language evolves (c.f. Swadesh list)
dolorifuge - that which relieves or eliminates sadness
dolce -
Dollo's law of irreversibility - a principle averring that evolution is not reversible
donnybrook - a public argument or quarrel; an uncontrolled fight; a brawl
doorplate -
double stop - a technique to play two notes simulataneously on a bowed stringed instrument
doxology -
dragoman -
dramaturgy -
drogue - a device external to a boat, attached to the stern and used to slow the bota in a storm and to keep the hull perpendicular to waves
dropsy [or hyropsy] - edema
dross -
Droste effect - the effect of a picture appearing within itself, in a place where a similar picture would realistically be expected to appear
Dulcarnon [< Arabic, Dhū 'l qarnain ذُو ٱلْقَرْنَيْن, the owner of the two horns] - Euclid's 47th proposition, the Pythagorean theorem
dungy - relating to dung
Dunning-Kruger effect - a cognitive bias in which unskilled individuals suffer from illusory superiority, mistakenly rating their ability much higher than average.
duplifix - a reduplicant (i.e., a reduplicated element of a base word)
Duverger's law - a simple-majority, single-ballot system favors a two-party system [exceptions, however: Canada, India, Great Britan]
Dweck effect - (1) individuals with a "growth" theory are more likely to continue working hard despite setbacks and (2) individuals' theories of intelligence can be affected by subtle environmental cues
dynamo -
dysania - inability or disinclination to awaken in the morning or, esp. to get out of bed
dyslogy - dispraise; uncomplimentary remarks [the antonym of 'eulogy']
Dyson sphere -
dyspeptic - 1. relating to or having dyspepsia; 2. of or displaying a morose disposition
dysphoria -
dysthymia -
easement - 1. an act or means of easing or relieving (as from discomfort); 2. an interest in land owned by another that entitles its holder to a specific limited use or enjoyment; 3. an area of land covered by an easement
eau-de-vie - brandy
ebb tide -
ectrodactyly - the absence of one or more central digitis
EDC (everyday-carry) -
edema [< Grk, οϊδημα, swelling] - an abnormal accumulation of fluid in the interstitium
eggcorn - (n) an idiosyncratic substitution of a word or phrase for a word or phrase that sound similar in the speaker's dialect
eidolon (pl: eidolons, eidola) (äi do' lun) - 1. an unstantial image; phantom; 2. ideal (e.g., an industrialist who reamins an eidolon of the visionary and ambitious self-made man)
Eigensprache [< Ger, twin speech] -
eisoptrophobia - fear of seeing one's reflection in a mirror
eke [1. OE, ēac; akin to L, aut and Gr, au, again; 2. < OE, iecan, ēcan; akin to L, augēre and Gr, auxein] - 1. (archaic) also; 2. (archaic) to increase; lengthen; 3. to get with great difficulty
élan - 1. enthusiastic vigor and liveliness; 2. distinctive style or flair
eld - 1. (rare or dialectical) one's age in years; one's period of life; 2. (archaic or poetic) old age; senility; 3. (archaic or poetic) an old person; 4. (archaic or poetic) an indefinitely long period of time; 5. (archaic or poetic) former age; antiquity; olden times; 6. (vi) (archaic or poetic) to age; become old; 7. (vt) (archaic or poetic) to cause (someone or something) to age
eldern (eldren) - (adj) 1. (of persons) elderly; aged; 2. (of things) old; ancient
eldritch -
ELIZA effect - the tendency to unconsciously assume computer behaviors are analogous to human behaviors
embolalia [< Grk, emballo-, to throw in] - automatic speech; verbalization of common filler interjections without awareness
embonpoint -
embouchure -
embroilment - imbroglio
emic - characterizing behavior in terms meaningful (consciously or subconsciously) to the actor
emic unit - (in linguistics) an invariant form obtained from the reduction of a class of variant forms to a limited number of abstract units
emolument -
empathy gap -
empyreal -
enallage -
enchiridion (en kee 'rid ee on) - a portable reference book, esp. for music or theology
encomium (< Grk enkomion < en + komos, revel, celebration) - glowing and warmly enthusiastic praise; also an expression of this
encroach -
endofunctor - a functor that maps a category to itself
endonym - a name given by an ethnic group to itself
endopleura - the inner coating of a seed
englishable - that wich may be renedered into english
enjoin -
ensiform -
ensilage -
ensuite - 1. (n) a bathroom connected to a bedroom; a private bathroom; 2. (adj) connected to a bedroom; 3. (adj) as part of a series
ent ? 1. (n) a fictional sentient tree; 2. to empty or pour
entasis - a slight convexity or swelling, as in the shaft of a column, intended to compensate for the illusion of concavity resulting from straight sides
entente cordiale -
entomophagy -
epanalepsis - a figure of speech defined by repetition of the initial word or phrase at the end of the same clause or sentence
epanorthosis - a figure of speech that signifies emphatic word replacement
eparchy -
epenthesis - the addition of one or more sounds to a word, esp. to the interior of the word
ephebia -
ephor - one of five annually elected leaders of Ancient Sparta who shared power with the Spartan kings
epicoracohumeraler -
epigaeous -
episemon (ep i 'sae mon) [< Grk., epi, on + sema, sign] - a badge or characteristic device; any of three Greek numeral signs (digamma: 6; koppa: 90; sampi: 900)
epistolary -
epizeuxis - repetition of a word or phrase in immediate succession for emphasis or to express vehemence
equanimous -
equerry - 1. an officer responsible for the care and supervision of the horses of a person of rank; 2. a personal attendant to a U.K. head of state or member of the royal family
erg [< Gk, ergon, work] - a unit of enery and mechanical work; 1 erg = 100 nJ
ergasiophobia - fear of or aversion to work
-ergic - [suffix] exhibiting or stimulating activity [of <root>]
ergosphere - a region in which a particle is necessarily propelled in locomotive con artificial astronomical megastructure surrounding a star
ersatz - made in imitation, esp. of inferior quality; artificial; inauthentic
escarpment -
escalump - a person who blocks the 'passing' lane of an escalator
eschew -
esculent -
Eselbrücke [< Ger, Esel, donkey, ass + brücke, bridge] - a mnemonic
espalier -
esse quam videri [= L, to be rather than to seem] - the proposition that substance matters more than appearance
estoppel - [law] a bar preventing one from making an allegation or a denial that contradicts what one has previously stated as the truth
estrange -
esurient -
et hoc genus omne -
etic - characterizing behavior according to a formal framework of a neutral observer
etic unit -
eucalypt - 
euonym -
eupeptic -
euouae (yue 'ue ee) - a type of cadence in medieval music; [orgin: the vowels from 'seculorum Amen']
Euonymus -
Euthyphro dilemma ~ Are the pious loved by the gods because they are pious, or are the pious considered pious because they are loved by the gods?
evanescent -
evidential -
evidentiary - 1. of evidence; evidential; 2. for the presentation or determination of evidence (e.g., an evidentiary hearing); 3. furnishing evidence, asserting, providing, evidential
examen - an examination; an investigation
exanimate - (v)
ex cathedra -
excoriate -
excrescence - the addition of a consonant
execrate - to denounce or detest
exculpatory evidence - evidence favorable to the defendant in a criminal trial that exonerates or tends to exonerate the defendant of guilt
exegesis - 
exiguous - (a) scanty; meager
ex officio - 
exogamy -
exonym - a name given by one ethnic group to another
exoteric - intelligible to outsiders
expatiate - 1. to speak or write at length (e.g., expatiated on the subject till everyone was bored); 2. to wander freely
expiate - 1. to make amends or reparation for; atone (e.g., expiate one's sins by acts of penance); 2. to make amends; atone
expostulate -
expurgate -
fabulist -
facinorous - exceedingly wicked
factotum [< L facere, do + totum, everything] - 1. a person having many diverse activities or responsibilities; 2. a general servant
faience -
fait accompli -
fallacy of the undistributed middle -
fallacy of the single cause (causal reductionism; reduction fallacy) -
fallow -
falsum (bottom) - 1. a prototypical state representing any contradiction; 2. the uptack symbol representing the prototypical contradiction
faltboat (foldboat) - a small boat having a collapsible wooden frame covered with waterproof cloth or plastic
famulus - a private secretary or assistant
Faneuil Hall - a market house and public hall in Boston, MA, called the 'Cradle of Liberty' because it was used as a meeting place by American patriots before the Revolutionary War
fari quae sentiat [< Horace] - to say what one feels
farrago - a confused mass of objects or people; any disordered mixture
farrow -
fascism - a form of radical authoritarian nationalism influenced by national syndicalism; a political system advocating a unified totalitarian state and an ultranationalist society
fatling - a young animal, such as a lamb or calf, fattened for slaughter
fatuous -
faubourg - an outlying part of a city or town, esp. Paris
fauteuil -
federacy - a form of government where one or several substate units enjoy considerably more independence than the majority of the substate units
felsic - of, like, or pertaining to igneous rocks that have relatively rich proportions of elements that form feldspar and quartz
fen -
feoffment -
fermata - a prolongation of a musical note, chord, or rest beyond its given value at the discretion of the performer
fermion [< Fermi]
Fermi paradox (silentium universi) - the apparent contradiction between high estimates of the probability of the existence of extraterrestrial civilizations and humanity's lack of contact with, or evidence for, such civilizations.
ferrule -
festal
feuar ?
Feuerkampf - firefight
feuilleton -
fewter - 1. a support or holder for a spear, attached to a saddle or breastplate; 2. (vt) to rest (a spear) in its fewter
fey (fay) -
FFF system - a humorous system of units based on the furlong, firking, and fortnight: 1 furlong = 220 yd; 1 firkin = 90 lb; 1 μftn = 1.2 s; 1 mftn = 20 min;
fiddle-faddle
fiqh - islamic jurisprudence
figment -
filbert - 1. the hazelnut; 2. the hazel tree; 3. a paintbrush used in oil and acrylic painting with a long ferrule and a curving, tongue-shaped head
firebug -
firth -
fishgig (fizgig) [< L fixus, fixed] - a pronged instrument for spearing fish
fistula -
flageolet -
flagitious -
flame war -
flaneur - 1. one who wanders or roams aimlessly; 2. an idler, a loafer
fleck -
fleshly - 1. of or relating to the body; corporeal; 2. of, relating to, or inclined to carnality; sensual; 3. not spiritual; worldly; 4. tending to plumpness; fleshy
fletching -
fleuron (aldus leaf) (hedera) - a typographical element, or glyph, used either as a punctuation mark or as an ornament for typographic compositions; a horticultural dingbat
flexagon - a flat model that can be flexed or folded in certain ways to reveal faces besides the two that were originally on the back and front
flic (fleek) - a French police officer
flimflam - nonsense; humbug
flintlock -
flivver - a small, cheap, usually old automobile
floccinaucinihilipilification -
fluid parcel (fluid element, material element) - a very small amount of fluid, identifiable throughout its dynamic history while moving with the fluid flow
Flynn effect - 
flyspeck -
flyspeck - 1. a speck made by fly excrement; 2. something small and insignificant
fnord - someone who is acting in an ironic, humorous, or surreal manner
folie à deux - the presence of the same or similar delusional ideas in two persons closely associated with one another
foment [< L fomentum, a heated compress < fovēre, to heat, soothe] - to cause or try to cause or promote the growth or development of (something bad or harmful); rouse; incite
fontanelle - an anotomical feature of an infant's skull comprising soft membranous gaps between incompletely formed cranial bones
fool's errand -
footslog - to walk, march, or trudge, esp. over a long distance
forcené (< Fr enraged, rabid) - (in reference to a horse) rearing on the hinde legs
foredeal -
forel -
foreward - an introduction to a book or other literary work by someone other than the author
forgetful functor (stripping functor) - a functor from one category to another category that has less formal structure (e.g., from groups to sets)
forlet - (dialectical) 1. to abandon; forsake; desert; neglect; 2. to forget
formedon -
formic -
fosse -
Foss's Day - 8 May 1940, during which was the first successful use of Banburismus to decrypt Enigma Kriegsmarine traffic
founder effect -
foundling -
fourragère - a braided cord worn usually around the left shoulder; esp. such a cord awarded as a decoration to a military unit
frabjous -
fractious -
franklin - a freeholder of the 14th or 15th century ranking below the gentry
freemartin - an infertile masculinized female, often chimeric, animal
Freiwirtschaft - 
fremd - (rare or dialectical) 1. strange; foreign; alien; outlandish; distant; far off; 2. not akin; unrelated; 3. unusual; unwonted; (archaic) 4. wild; untamed
Fremdschämen - embarrassment that is experienced when others obliviously act in an embarrassing manner
frenulum - a small fold of mucous membrane extending from the floor of the mouth to the midline of the underside of the tongue
fricatrice -
friendship paradox - the observation that most people have fewer friends than their friends have, on average
frith -
frobnicate - to frob, twiddle, or tweak
frobnitz - an unspecified physical object; a widget; a blackbox
frounce - 1. a canker in the mouth of a hawk; 2. to gather into or adorn with plaits, as a dress
fruit of the poisonous tree - 1. evidence that has been attained illegally; 2. a situation in which evidence has been attained illegally
frumenty [or furmenty or furmity] [from Latin frumentum, < frui, to enjoy] - (n) a dish of wheat boiled in milk and usually sweetened and spiced
frustum - the portion of a solid (normally a cone or pyramid) that lies between two parallel planes cutting it
fudoshin [< Jap, immovable mind] - a state of equanimity or imperturbability that contributes to the effectiveness of an advanced practitioner
fugacious - tending to disappear; fleeting
full-throated -
fulsome -
fundament - the buttocks; the anus; the natural features of a land surface unaltered by humans
fungible -
furor -
furtive -
fustian - ridiculously popmpous, bombastic, or inflated language; adopting a declamatory or florid style of speech
fustuarium (fustuarium supplicum) [< L, the punishment of cudgeling] - a severe form of military discipline in which a soldier was cudgeled to death
futhark (futhorc, futhork) - 1. the common Germanic runic alphabet; 2. the Old English alphabet
futtock - one of the curved timbers in the lower part of a nautical vessel
fylfot -
gaffle - 1. an artificial spur or gaff for gamecocks; 2. a lever to bend crossbows
gainstrife -
galactophagous -
galant style - a movement in music, visual arts, and literature popular in the mid-18th century; Empfindsamer Stil or rococo style, emphasizing light elegance rather than dignified gravity
galeanthropy -
galimatias (gal i 'mae shi us) [< Fr, gibberish] - nonsense; a confused mixture of unrelated things
gallimaufry - a jumble, hodgepodge, medley
gallinaceous -
gallowglass (galloglass) [< Irish Gaelic, galloglach = gall, foreigner + oglach, solider] - an armed retainer or mercenary in the service of an Irish chieftain
gambol -
gamin (gam' un) - 1. a boy who hangs around on the streets; urchin
gamine (gu meen') - 1. an attractive and usually thin and small woman or girl who often shows a playful desire t ocause trouble; 2. a girl who hangs around on the streets; 3. a small playfully mischievous girl
gangway -
garadene (or Garadene) (gæ' du reen) [from the demon-possessed Gadarene swine in Matthew 8:28 that rushed into the sea] - headlong, preciptate (e.g.,g a gadarene rush to the cities)
garmento - someone active in the garment industry, esp. in New York City
garn - a unit of measure for symptoms resulting from space-adaptation syndrome
garnishee - (n) 1. a person who is served with a legal process of garnishment; (vt) 2. to serve with a garnishment; 3. to take (a debtor's wages) by legal authority
gaslighting - a form of mental abuse by which false information is presented with the intent of making a victim doubt his/her own memory, perception, or sanity
Gastarbeiter -
gastropub - a public house or tavern that serves high-quality food
gazump - 1. to swindle; extort; 2. to raise the selling price of something (esp. property) after previously agreeing to a lower one; 3. to buy a property by bidding more than the price of an existing, accepted offer
gekker - (v) to emit a throaty rattling sound, as like a fox
gelastics ?
Gelfond's constant - e^π, which is equivalent to e^(i * π)^(-i) = (-1)^(-i); the sum of the volumes of all even-dimensional balls
Gemara -
gemarah - 
Gematria - a Jewish system of numerology
Gemeinschaft -
gemellology ?
gemination (consonant elongation) - the elongation of the articulation of a consonant (Note: vowel length is distinctive in more languages than is consonant length.) (Note: the articulation of geminated non-obstruents is simply prolonged; the gemination of obstruents requires a delay in the release of pulmonic obstruction.)
gendarmerie - a military force charged with police duties among civilian populations
genetic load - the difference between the fitness of the theoretically optimal genotype of a population and the fitness of the observed average genotype
geniocracy - the framework for a system of government, first proposed by Raël in 1977, that advocates creative intelligence and skill at problem solving as criteria for regional governance; government by individuals who meet a certain minimal criterion of creative intelligence or problem solving; rule by the intelligent; a system of governance where creativity, innovation, intelligence and wisdom are required for those who wish to govern
gentilic - 1. tribal, racial, national; 2. of or relating to a noun or adjective that denotes ethnic or national affiliation; 3. triabl or national; 4. describing the inhagitants of a particular place; demonymic; 5. (n) a personal name derived from a place name
genus-differentia definition -
Georgism [Henry George] - a model of political economy that offers solutions to social and ecological problems, relying on principles of land rights and public finance which attempt to integrate economic efficiency with social justice; an economic philosophy holding that the economic value derived from natural resources and natural opportunities should belong equally to all residents of a community, but that people should own the value that they create themselves
Gerousia - a council of leading elder Spartans
germinate -
Gesellschaft -
Gestalt -
Gettier problem - a philosophical question about whether a piece of information that happens to be true but that someone believes for invalid reasons, such as a faulty premise, counts as knowledge
gibbet - 1. an upright post with a crosspiece used for execution and subsequent public display; a gallows; 2. the projecting arm of a crane, from which the load is suspended; the jib
gibbous [< L, gibbosus < gibbus, hump] - 1. a) marked by convexity or swelling; b) seen with more than half but not all of the apparent disk illuminated; 2. having a hump; humpbacked
gimbal -
glabella - the smooth area between the eyebrows just above the nose
gladiate -
gladius -
glair (glaire) [< L. clarus, clear] - 1. the white of an egg; 2. a sizing or glaze made of egg white; 3. a viscous substance resembling egg white
glissando -
gluon - vector gauge bosons that mediate strong interactions of quarks
gnothi seauton - (n?) the Ancient Greek aphorism 'know thyself'
gobemouche -
godhead -
goldbug -
gonfalon - a standard or ensign, consisting of a pole with a crosspiece from which a banner is suspended
googlegänger - a person found in a google search that has the same name as the searcher
gorgoneia -
gormless - lacking intelligence; stupid
gracile -
Grand Guignol - (n) drama that emphasizes the horrifying or the macabre
gratis dictum - an assertion that a person makes without beign obligated to do so, or a court's discussion of a point or question not raised by the record, or its suggestion of a rule not applicable in teh case at bar
gravid -
gravisense -
gravisensory -
gravitational keyhole - a small region of space where a planet's gravity would alter the orbit of a passing asteroid so that the asteroid would collide with that planet during a given future orbital pass
grapnel -
grawlix - 
greave - a piece of armor that protects the leg, esp. the shin
greaves - the unmeltable residue left after animal fat has been rendered
gree - mastery; superiority
griffage - illegible handwriting
grimalkin -
gristle -
grith - (n) protection or sanctuary provided by Old English law to persons in certain circumstances, as when in a church or traveling on the king's highway
grizzle -
groak - to silently watch someone eating, hoping to be invited
grog -
growlery - a retreat for times of ill humour; a place to be alone when upset
guage boson
guaiac ?
guerdon - 1. a reward, prize, or recompense for a service; an accolade; 2. (vt) to give such a reward to
guiddon - 1. a small pennant or banner carried by infantry soldiers to direct troop movement; 2. a soldier to carry such a banner
gull-wing door - a car door that is hinged at the roof rather than at the side
gushing
guttersnipe -
gyascutis [gyascutus?] -
gynandromorph -
gymnologize - to debate without clothes
gyrfalcon (gerfalcon, jerfalcon) -
habergeon (haubergeon) - 1. a short, sleeveless coat of mail; 2. a hauber
habilitation [< L habilis, fit, proper, skillful] - the highest academic qualification a scholar can achieve in many countries in Europe, Central Asia, Egypt, and the Caucasus and is usually earned after a research doctorate
hackly - 1. nicked or notched; jagged; rough or jagged, as if hacked
hadith - islamic tradition; the summation of reports of the teachings, deeds, and sayings of Muhammad
haecceity (hek 'see it tee) - the aspect of existence on which individuality depends; the hereness and nowness of reality
hadron [< Gk, hadros, large, massive] - (n) a composite particle of quarks bound by the strong force
haha - a boundary to a park or garden, usually in the form of a fence sunk in a ditch
halakhah -
halberd -
Hamiltonian cathedral - a site of vast industrial-scale resource development
hanaper - a hamper
handsel - 1. a gift given at New Year, or at the start of some enterprise or new situation, meant to ensure good luck; 2. the first installment or first payment of money in a day or series; 3. to give a handsel to; 4. to inaugurate by means of ceremony; 5. to use or do for the first time
Hanlon's razor - 'Never attribute to malice that which can be adequately explained by stupidity.'
hapax legomenon -
hard-boiled - 1. a) devoid of sentimentality (e.g., a hard-boiled drill sergeant); b) of, relating to, or being a detective story featuring a tough unsentimental protagonist and a matter-of-fact attitude toward violence; 2. hardheaded, practical (e.g., hard-boiled business decisions)
harquebus ('har ku bus) (arquebus, hackbut) - a heavy portable matchlock gun invented during the 15th century
harridan - a vicious and scolding, usually older, woman
hatchment - a diamond-shaped panel bearing the coat of arms of a deceased person
hauberk -
haulier -
hautboy - the oboe
hawala [hundi] [< Arabic, transfer] - an informal value transfer system based on the performance and honour of a huge network of money brokers, primarily located in the Middle East, North Africa, the Horn of Africa, and the Indian subcontinent, operating outside of, or parallel to, traditional banking, financial channels, and remittance systems
hawser -
headnodic -
hebetate - 1. to become dull or stupdi; 2. to have become dull or stupid
hebetude -
hecatomb [< Grk, hekaton, 100 + bous, ox] - a large sacrifice or slaughter; the killing of one hundred animals or people
hedonic treadmill (hedonic adaptation) - the supposed tendency of people to quickly return to a relatively stable level of happiness despite major positive or negative live events or life changes
helix - the prominent rim of the auricula (pinna or auricle)
helpmate (helpmeet) - 
hemopoiesis -
hesternopothia - a pathological yearning for the goold old days
heterogram - an order-1 isogram
heterogonous - 1.  Characterized by the alternation of sexual and parthenogenic generations. 2. of or pertaining to monoclinous flowers of two or more kinds occurring on different individuals of the same species, the kinds differing in the relative length of stamens and pistils. 
hewer ? miner
hibernaculum (hibernacle) -
hidebound - 1. stubbornly prejudiced, narrow-minded, or inflexible; 2. having abnormally dry, stiff skin that adheres closely to the underlying flesh (used of domestic animals such as cattle); 3. having the bark so contracted and unyielding as to hinder growth (used of trees)
highway hypnosis -
hikikomori (Jap, pulling inward, being confined) - 1. a person who seeks extreme degrees of isolation and confinement; 2. a person who refuses to leave the house and isolates the self from society for a period exceeding six months; 3. the sociological phenomenon of such people and and their behavior
histrionic -
Hitchens' razor - 'The burden of proof lies with the claim-maker; if this burden is not met, an opponent need not argue against the unfounded claim'
hobble -
hobbledehoy - an awkward adolescent boy
Hoc est fadus meum. Omnis masculus circumcidetur -
hokum -
holacracy - a social technology or system of organizational governance in which authority and decision-making are distributed throughout a fractal holarchy of self-organizing temas rather than being vested at the top of a hierarchy.
holarchy (holoarchy) - a connection between holons
holm [< ON, holmi, islet] - 1. land that is liable to flooding; 2. a river island
holon [coined by Arthur Koestler in 'The Ghost in the Machine'] - something that is simultaneously a whole and a part
holonymy - a semantic relation between two words/concepts A and B such that A comprises multiple instances of B
holorime -
holt - 1. a small piece of woodland or a woody hill; a copse; 2. the lair of an animal, esp. of an otter
Holyrood - the informal name of Scotlands' parliament
homogamy -
homoiotherm ?
homophily - the tendency of individuals to associate and bond with similar others
homothety (homogeneous dilation) - a transformation of an affine space that preserves similarity
hopak [< Ukr, hopakty, jump] (gopak) - a Ukranian dance often characterized by jumping, squatting, and spinning
hörgr (pl: hörgar) (also hearg) - a type of religious building or altar, possibly comprising stones, used in Norse paganism
horseshoe theory - a model of ideological typology such that the far right and far left are more similar to each other than to moderates
hostler (ostler) (häs'/äs' lur) - 1. one who takes care of horses or mules; 2. one who moves locomotives in and out of a roundhouse; 3. one who services locomotives
hotbed - 1. a bed of soil enclosed in glass, heated especially by fermenting manure and used for forcing or for raising seedlings; 2. an environment that favors rapid growth or development (e.g., a hotbed of activity)
hothouse - 1. (n) a heated greenhouse; 2. (adj) grown in a hothouse (e.g., a hothouse orchid); 3. (n) an environment conducive to vigorous growth or development; a hotbed (e.g., With its mix of African, Latin, European, and pan-American influences, the Caribbean is truly a musical hothouse.); 4. (obsolete) a bordello; 5. (vt) to cultivate (as like plants or children) in a hothouse
hot shot -1. a lethal injection of heroin or some other opiate; 2. a round shot that is heated before being fired from muzzle-loaded cannons for the purpose of setting fire to enemy infrastructure
Huginn [< Old Norse, thought] - one of a pair of ravens (the other being Muninn) that fly across Midgard and return with information for Odin
Humanae salutis [< L, of human salvation] - a papal bull by John XXII in 1961 that summoned the Second Vatican Council
Hume's fork - an explanation, developed by later philosophers, of David Hume's aggressive division of 'relations of ideas' from 'matters of fact and real existence'
hurtle -
hymeneal -
hyperbolic discounting -
hyperfine - extremely fine or thin, as in a spectral line split into two or more components
hypergraph - a generalized graph of which an edge may connect any number of vertices
hypernym -
hypobulia - difficulty in making decisions
hypocorism [< Grk, hypokorizesthai, to use child-talk] - 1. a name of endearment; a pet name; 2. a diminutive form of a name for greater intimacy; 3. the use of such names
hypocycloid -
hyponym - a word whose 'semantic field' is included within that of another word (its hypernym) (e.g., 'pigeon' is a hyponym of 'bird', which in turn is a hyponym of 'animal')
iatrogenic - induced in a patient by a physician's activity, manner, or therapy
idiothetic - 1. of the use of internal cues when navigating a maze, etc; 2. [psychology] of or relating to what distinguishes members of a species from one another
ignoramus et ignorabimus - [cf. Hilbert's `in mathematics, there is no ignorabimus']
ignosticism (igtheism) - the idea that every theological position assumes too much about the concept of God and other theological concepts
Ignotum per Ignotius -
imam - for Sunni muslims, one who leads formal (Fard) prayers; for muslims in general, a recognized religious scholar or authority; for Shia muslims, sinless exemplars chosen by Allah
imbricate -
imbroglio - an intricate, confusing or disturbing situation; a confused mass or heap
imbrue - (v) 1. to saturate; 2. to stain
immanent -
immoderacy -
impassible -
impasto - a technique used in painting characterized by thickly laying paint on a canvas
impi - a Zulu regiment
impostor syndrome - a psychological phenomenon in which people are unable to internalize their accomplishments; despite evidence of their competence, those with the syndrome remain convinced that they are frauds and do not deserce the success that they've achieved.
imprimatur -
impudent -
incandescent -
inchoate -
incidence structure - a hypergraph; a triple C = (P, L, I), where P is a set of points, L is a set of lines, and I (a subset of P * L) is the incidence relation
incidental - 1. (a) occurring or likely to occur as an unpredictable or minor accompaniment; 2. (a) of a minor, casual, or subordinate nature
incipit - 1. the first few words of a poem, song, or book; 2. the first few opening notes of a musical composition; 3. the first characters of a long string of characters, such as an encryption key or product key
inculcate -
inculpatory evidence - evidence in a criminal trial that tends to prove the defendant's guilt
incunabulum (in ku 'nab u lum) - an early printed book; an early version or stage; the cradle or birthplace of something
indefectible - 1. having the ability to resist decay or failure; lasting; enduring; 2. having no flaw or defect; perfect
indemnify - 1. to protect against damage, loss, or injury; insure; 2. to make compensation to for damage, loss, or injury suffered
indocible -
indotherm -
indyref (in' dee ref) - 1. the 2014 referendum on Scottis independence; 2. a referendum to determine whether a constituent substate should achieve independence
in flagrante -
infra dig -
ineluctable -
inexorable - relentless; not capable of being persuaded by entreaty
ingather -
ingratiate -
ingravescent -
innamorata -
insapory - insipid
insectary -
insouciant -
integral nationalism - one of five types of nationalism defined by Carlton Hayes, characterized by anti-individualism, statism, and aggressive expansionist militarism
integument - 1. a natural outer covering or coat, such as the skin of an animal or the membrane enclosing an organ; 2. the envelope of a botanic ovule
inter alia -
inter alios -
intercalate - 1. to insert (as a day) into a calendar; 2. to insert between or among existing elements or layers
interlocutor - 1. a (usually official) participant in a conversation; 2. a performer in a minstrel show who is placed midway between the end men and who engages in banter with them
interlocutor - 1. a (usually official) participant in a conversation; 2. a performer in a minstrel show who is placed midway between the end men and who engages in banter with them
interloper -
intermezzo ?
interstitial -
intonation - 1. a musician's realization of pitch accuracy; 2. the pitch accuracy of a musical instrument
intone - 1. (vt) to utter in musical or prolonged tones; recite in singing tones or in a montone; to speak (a prayer, poem, etc.) in a way that sounds like music or chanting; 2. (vt) to say (something) in a slow and even voice; 3. (vi) to speak in singing tones or in monotone
introflection (noncatenative morphology) - a class of types of word formation such that the root of a word is modified but not additional morphemes are appended (e.g., ablaut, transfixation, reduplication, truncation)
in the main -
intimate -
invigilator - 1. a person who supervises students during an examination; a proctor; 2. a person who supervises a gallery at a museum
ipsative - [psychology] indicating a specific type of measure by which respondents compare two or more desirable options and pick the preferred
ipse dixit - an assertion made but not proved; dictum
irony (< Gk, eironeia, dissimulation, feigned ignorance) - a rhetorical device, literary technique or event characterized by an incongruity or contrast between the expectations of the situation and the facts of the situation
irreligion -
ismah - the muslim concept of sinlessless and infallibility
isobar - (n) a nuclide characterized by mass number
isochoric process (isovolumetric process) - a thermodynamic process during which the volume of the closed system undergoing such a process remains constant
isogram - a logological term for a word or phrase without a repeating letter or a word or phrase in which each letter has the same frequency
isopleth [< Grk, πληθος, quantity] - a contour line that depicts a variable that cannot be measured at a point, but that instead must be calculated from data collected over an area
isospin [isotopic spin, isobaric spin] - 
isotone - (n) a nuclide characterized by neutron count
isotope - (n) a nuclide characterized by proton count
janteloven (Law of Jante) - the idea that there is a pattern of group behavior towards individuals within Scandivian countries that negatively portrays and criticises individual success and achievement as unworthy and inappropriate.
januis clausis - (adv) behind closed doors
jargogle - to befuddle or mess up
jape -
jejune -
jentacular - during or pertaining to breakfast
jeofail -
jeremiad - a lamentation or prolonged complaint; an angry or cautionary harangue
jerkwater - 1. remote and unimportant; 2. trivial
Jerusalem syndrome
Jespersen's cycle -
jeu de mots -
jib -
jibe -
jirble - to pour out a liquid with an unsteady hand
jocose -
jökulhlaup - a glacial outburst flood; any large and abrupt release of water from a subglacial or proglacial lake
Josephus problem - named after Flavius Josephus; siege of Yodfat; circle of soldiers killing each other every third as circle of men diminishes
josser - a person not born to the circus but who performs in a circus
jouissance - (n) pleasure; sexual pleasure; orgasm
journal intime - (n) intimate journal; private journal
judicial dictum - an opinion by a court on a question that is directly involved, briefed, and argued by counsel, and even passed on by the court, but that is not essential to the decision
judicious -
jument - a beast; a beast of burden
jus divinum - 
jussieuean ?
just intonation (pure intonation) - any musical tuning in which the frequencies of notes are related by ratios of small whole numbers
juvenescent -
kabaragoya -
kabedon [< Jap, kabe, wall + don, thud] - a situation popular in romance comics in which a man pins a woman against a wall  with a thud
kaizen [< Jap, improvement] - a Japanese philosophy or practice that focuses on continuous improvement of processes in manufacturing, engineering, or business management
kakorrhaphiophobia -
kalian -
kalokagathia -
kalopsia - the delusion that things are beautiful than they really are
kalos kagathos -
kal va-chomer (also 'din' - conclusion) -
Kardashev scale - a measure of a civilization's technological development, based on the amount of energy a civilization is able to utilize
katzenjammer -
katsaridaphobia - fear of cockroaches
keelson - a timber or girder fastened above and parallel t othe keel of a ship or baot for additional strength
ken -
kenspeckle (< Old Norse, kennispeki, power of recognition) - (adj) easily recognizable or distinguishable; conspicuous
kensho [< Jap ken, sight + shō, nature, essence] - initial insight or an awakening to Buddhahood (not full Buddhahood, however)
Kessler syndrome (collisional cascading; ablation cascade) - a scenario in which the density of objects in low Earth orbit is sufficiently great that collisions between objects could cause a cascade
keystone -
kinetosis - motion sickness
kit car (component car) - an automoble that is not pre-assembled but must be procured as a set of parts and assembled by the owner or a proxy of the owner 
kitchen midden - a refuse heap; specifically, a mound marking the site of a primitive human habitation
kithe (kaith) - (archaic or dialectical) to make known; to reveal
Kleiber's law - the observation that, for most animals, the metabolic rate scales to the 3/4 power of the mass
knabble -
Knightian uncertainty -
knight-errant - a knight traveling in search of advantures in which to exhibit military skill, prowess, and generosity
knock-on - (adj) resulting inevitably but indirectly from another event or circumstance (e.g., the works closed with the direct loss of 3000 jobs and many more from the knock-on effect on the area)
Kofferwort [calque] - mot-valise
kopophobia - fear of exhaustion
korma -
karoshi [< Jap] - death from overwork
koru [< Maori, loop] - a spiral shape based on the shape of a new unfurling silver fern frond and symbolizing new life, growth, strength, and peace
krait - any nonaggressive brightly colored venemous elapid snake of the southeast Asia
kratocracy [< Grk krateros, strong] - government by those who are capable of seizing power by force or cunning
krotoscope - an applause-measuring instrument
kubotan - a close-quarter self-defense weopen derived from teh yawara
Kummerspeck [< Ger, grief + bacon] - excess weight gained from emotional overeating
kyodo - the art of the Japanese (long)bow
laconic -
Laelaps - a dog of Greek mythology that never failed to catch what she hunted
laevorotary - of or relating to the properties of a plane of polarized light rotating widdershins
lagom [< Swedish lagom, archaic dative plural of 'lag', rule of common sense] - 1. (adj) enough, sufficient, adequate, just right; 2. (adv) in moderation, in balance, of suitable amount or extent, of appropriate simplicity [Lagom är bäst. -- The right amount is best; Enough is as good as a feast.]
lallation - unintelligible baby talk
lalochezia - 
lammergeier ?
landgrave -
land-poor - poor or in need of ready money while owning or holding much unremunerative land; especially, poor because of the taxes and other maintenance charges against such land
languaginal ?
Laniakea - the galaxy supercluster that contains the Milky Way
laparotomy [< Grk, lapara, flank < laparos, soft] - surgical incision into the abdominal wall, esp. the flank or loin
lapsebeams -
lardaceous - lardlike, fatty
larine -
latibulize - to hibernate
lavra -
lavritic -
lawn mullet - a neat front yard but an unkempt backyard
layabout - a lazy or idle or shiftless person; loafer
leachate - a product or solution formed by leaching, esp. a solution containing contaminants picked up through the leaching of soil; any liquid that, in the course of passing through matter, extracts soluble or suspended solids, or any other component of the material through which it has passed
leading light -
leatherstocking ?
Leidenfrost effect -
legato [< Ital, tied together] - 1. (adj) (music) in a smooth, even style without any noticeable break between notes; 2. (n) a legato passage or movement
lemmatizer -
lentiginous -
leporine -
lepton (< Gk, leptos, small, light) 
letter patent [pl: letters patent] - a type of legal instrument in the form of a published written order issued by a monarch or president, generally granting an office, right, monopoly, title, or status to a person or corporation
lettre de cachet - a warrant issued by the monarch in ancien-régime France, esp. one which imprisons someone without trial
leud (lued) - a vassal or tenant in the early Middle Ages
libertine -
lich (lich) - 1. (archaic) a corpse; 2. a reanimated corpse or undead being
ligneous -
limaceous -
limaçon [< Fr limaçon < L limax, snail] - a type of epitrochoidal roulette
Lima syndrome - a proposed converse to Stockholm syndrome -- that is, a condition characterized by sympathy of abductors for their hostages
limophoitos - insanity brought on by lack of food
lineament (lin' ee u ment) - 1. a distinctive shape, contour, or line, esp. of the face; 2. a definitive or characteristic feature (often in the plural) (e.g., The gross and subtle folds of corruption on the average senatorial face are hardly the lineaments of virtue."
lionize -
lipogram [< Gr, leipogrammatos, excepting a letter] - a type of contrained writing or word game such that a particular letter or set of letters must be eschewed
liripipe ('lir i paip) - the long tail of a graduate's hood; a part or lesson committed to memory
listless -
litotes -
livery - distinctive dress or uniforms worn by male servants, ushers, or retainers of a feudal lord
livewire - vivacious, alert, or energetic (as of a person)
live wire - a vivacious, alert, or energetic person
livid - 1. discolored, 2. ashen or pallid, 3. furious; 4. discolored by coagulation of blood beneath the skin; 5. (of light) imparting a deathlike luminosity
loath (loth) - unwilling, reluctant, averse, disinclined
locution - 1. a particular word, phrase, or expression, esp one that is used by a particular person or group; 2. style of speaking; phraseology
lodestar (loadstar) - 1. (archaic) a star that leads or guides, esp. the North Star; 2. one that serves as an inspiration, model, or guide; a guiding principle, interest, or ambition
logatome -
loge - 
loggia - a roofed, open gallery
logology - the field of recreational linguistics
logomachy - 1. a dispute over or about words; 2. a controversy marked by verbiage
longanimous - (adj) long-suffering; patient; showing self-control and restraint; able to bear injuries patiently; forbearing
lothario -
loupe -
loutish -
louver -
Lovelace test -
lowboy - a low chest of drawers
lucubration -
ludibrious -
luff -
lug - a handle or projection used as a hold (e.g., for shoelacing) or support
luthier (lue' tee/thee er) - one who makes strined musical instruments (as violins or guitars)
lychgate (lych-gate, lichgate) - a churchyard gateway with a root, under which a corpse was laid during a funeral
lyrical - 1. having an artistically beautiful or expressive quality; 2. expressing deep feelings in a way that is like a song; 3. writing lyric poetry; 4. (of an opera singer) having a light and pure voice; 5.a) suitable for singing to the lyre or being set to music and sung; b) of, relating to, or being drama set to music, esp. operatic music; 6.a) expressing direct usually intense personal emotion esp. in a manner suggestive of song; b) exuberant; rhapsodic
macaronic - 1. of or containing a mixture of vernacular words with Lain words or with vernacular words with latinate endings; 2. of or involving a mixture of two or more languages
macguffin - a plot device in the form of some goal, desired object, or other motivator that the protagonist pursues, often with little or no narrative explanation
macrodome - a dome parallel to the longer lateral axis of an orthorhombic crystal
macroverbumsciolist - 1. a person who is ignorant of sesquipedalian words; 2. a person who pretends to know a word, but then secretly refers to a dictionary
madcap -
mae west ? reserve parachute (?)
mafic - of, like, or pertaining to rocks that have relatively rich proportions of magnesium and iron
mahout - the keeper and driver of an elephant
maieutic -
mainstay -
malaphor - (n) an idiom blend; an erro in which two similar figures of speech are nonsensically merged
malapropism [Mrs. Malaprop < mal a propos] - (n) the use of an incorrect word in place of a word with a similiar sound
malkin -
malnoia -
maltose - a disaccharide of glucose used in bacteriological culture media and as a nutrient in infant feeding
malus - (n) the return of performance-related compensation originally paid by an employer to an employee as a result of the discovery of a defect in performance
mamma {mammae} - nipple
mammon - 1. riches or material wealth; 2. a personification of riches as an evil spirit or deity; 3. material wealth or possessions esp. as having a debasing influence
mandative -
mandorla -
mandrel - 
maniple -
manipular -
manse -
mantilla - a square of white lace that worn by women upon the head in a Catholic service
maodun [< Chinese, spear-shield] -
march (usually pl) (mark) [< OE mearc, boundary, march, sign; akin to OHG marha, boundary and Latin margo] - 1. a militarized border region (e.g., the Scottish Marches); 2. a border region; frontier, esp. a district originally established to defend a boundary; 3. the territory of a marquess (marquis); 4. the progression of epileptic activity through the motor centers of the cerbral cortex that is manifested in localized convulsions in first one and then an adjacent part of the body
marchpane -
margrave -
mari complaisant - a cuckold who accepts his wife's infidelity
marque -
marsupium - the pouch of a marsupial
mascaron - a grotesque face on a door-knocker
mashal -
masoretic -
masterstroke -
masthead - 1. the top of a mast; 2. a) the printed matter in a newspaper or periodical that gives the title and details of ownership, advertising rates, and subscription rates; b) the name of a publication (as a newspaper) displayed on the top of the first page; c) the staff members whose names are on a masthead
matinal -
matrioshka brain -
matroid - a structure that generalizes the notion of linear independence in vector spaces
Matthew effect -
maudlin -
mawashi - the deft manipulation of a writing instrument with one's hands; pen twirling
mawkish -
maxillae (maxillary) - two bones forming the upper jaw and palate of the mouth
Maxwell's demon -
McClintock effect - menstrual synchrony
mea culpa -
meatus [mee ae' tus] [< L, meare, to go > permeate] - a natural body passage; a body opening or passage, such as the opening of the ear or the urethral canal
mediastinum [< Medieval L., mediastinus, medial, inferior servant, drudge] - the region in mammals containing the heart and all of the thoracic viscera except the lungs
megagaltastic [coined by a person named 'Gal'] - characterized by an extensive vocabulary
melee -
melodramatic
menarche - the first menstrual cycle in a female human
mendaciloquent -
mendacious [< L mendax, lying, deceitful < menda, fault, defect, typo] -
mendicant [< L, mendicare, to beg, ask alms < mendicus, beggar, cripple < menda, fault, physical defect] -
mens rea [< L, rea, guilty] - the mental element of the offence; the intentions of a perpetrator; knowledge of wrongdoing [actus non facit reum nisi mens sit rea]
mephitic -
mereology -
meritocracy -
mermaid purse -
meroblastic - characterized by incomplete cleavage [of zygotes] because of the presence of a mass of yolk material
meronym -
merrymaking -
mesne (meen) - (adj) (law) intermediate; intervening
mesne lord - (n) a feudal lord who holds land as tenant of a superior (as a king) but who is lord to his own tenant
meson - (n) a hadron comprising a quark and antiquark
mesopygion -
metaplasm [< Grk, plassein, to mold] - 1. (biology) the nonliving matter or inclusions, as starch or pigments, within a cell; 2. (grammar) a) a change in he structure of a word or sentence made by adding, removing, or transposing the sounds or words of which it is composed or the letters that represent them; b) the formation of oblique cases from a stem other than that of the nominative; 3. modification of word order for rhetorical emphasis
metasyntactic variable -
metathesis - the rearranging of sounds, moras, or syllables in a word or of words in a sentence
metrophobia -
mew - (obsolete) - a gull, seagull
miamus - foul vapors emitted from rotting matter; unwholesome air or atmosphere
mickle -
micromort - a unit of risk measuring a one-in-a-million probability of death; a microprobability of death
microprobability -
Middle-English creole hypothesis -
midden [< Old Norse myki, dunk + dyngja, manure pile] - 1. dunghill; 2.a) a refuse heap; esp. a kitchen midden; b) a small pile (as of seeds, bones, or leaves) gathered by a rodent or pack rat
middoth (middot) (possibly plural) - Rabbi Hillel's seven rules of hermeneutics
middlemarch - 1. the incipit of Dante's Inferno; 2. march; marchland
Midrashim -
mignon -
mikveh - a bath used for the purpose of ritual immersion in Judaism
milieu -
millboard - a stiff heavy paperboard used primarily for book covers
milliner - a person who designs, makes, trims, or sells women's hats
millrace -
mim - prim; demure
minacious -
minarchism - (n) (also known as minimal statism) is a political philosophy. It is variously defined by sources. In the strictest sense, it holds that states ought to exist (as opposed to anarchy), that their only legitimate function is the protection of individuals from aggression, theft, breach of contract, and fraud, and that the only legitimate governmental institutions are the military, police, and courts. In the broadest sense, it also includes fire departments, prisons, the executive, and legislatures as legitimate government functions.[1][2][3] Such states are generally called night-watchman states.
minatory -
mince - (vt) 1. a) to cut or chop into small pieces; b) to subdivide minutely; to damage by cutting up; 2. to utter with affectation; 3. to restrain (words) with the bounds of decorum; (vi) 4. to walk with short steps in a prim affected manner
mirror nucleus - (n) a nuclide characterized by pairs, the neutron count of one of which matching the proton count of the other
mise en abyme (mise en abîme) - 1. the droste effect, i.e., the visual experience of standing between two mirrors; 2. a formal technique by which an image contains a smaller copy of itself
miscue -
misere - pslam 51
misgiving -
misoscopist - one who hates beauty
misprision - 1.a) neglect or wrong performance of official duty; b) concealment of treason or felony by one who is not a participant in the treason or felony; c) seditious conduct against the government or the courts; 2. misunderstanding; misinterpretation
misqueme - to displease; offend
missilier ?
mogue ?
moiré -
moksha ?
molder -
mondegreen - (n) the mishearing or misinterpretation of a phrase as a result of near-homophony, in a way that gives it a new meaning
moniker -
monoclonal - 1. (adj) of, forming, or derived from a single clone (e.g., a monoclonal population of tumor cells); 2. (n) a monoclonal product -- esp. a monoclonal antibody
monocoque - a metal structure, such as an aircraft, in which teh skin absorbs all or most of the stresses to which the body is subjected
monodromy [< Grk, one + circular racetrack] - the globalization of local morphisms in category theory; the study of how mathematical objects behave around a singularity
monody = 1. a poem in which a person laments another's death; (music) 2. monophony; 3. a solo vocal style characterized by a single melodic line and instrumental accompaniment
monogamish - mostly monogamous but not strictly so
monomaniacal -
monomyth - (n) a basic pattern of many narratives comprising 17 stages: (departure) 1. call to adventure, 2. refusal of the call, 3. supernatural aid, 4. crossing of first threshold, 5. belly of the whale (baptism), (initiation) 6. road of trials, 7. meeting of the goddess, 8. woman as temptress, 9. atonement with the father, 10. apotheosis, 11. the ultimate boon, (return) 12. refusal of the return; 13. magic flight, 14. rescue from without, 15. crossing of the return threshold, 16. master of two worlds, 17. freedom to live
mononymous -
Moravec moat - the theorized [by futurist Hans Moravec] insulation of menial laborors from forced unemployment by automation
mordrum - the act of killing a person in a secret manner
morganatic - designating a marriage (or the wife involved) between a man of higher rank and a woman of lower rank, such that the wife has no claim on the husband's possessions or title
morphism - a structure-preserving mapping from one mathematical structure to another
motley -
mottled -
moulin - a roughly circular, nearly vertical, well-like shaft within a glaciar through which water enters
mouthpiece -
muckety-muck -
multifarious -
mucid (myue' sid) [< L, mūcidus, musty, moldy] - [archaic] moldy; musty; slimy
mucor (myue' kur) - any phycomycetous fungus that forms a furry coating on foodstuffs
muko [< Luganda] - the brother of one's wife
mumpsimus [< L., sumpsimus, we have received] - a view stubbornly held even after its defeasance
murcid - slothful, shirking work or duty
murid - of or relating to a family (Muridae) comprising the typical mice and rats and often those rodents classified as cricetids 
murine -
murshid - a Muslim religious teacher
musangi [< Luganda, one you met] - the husband of the the sister of one's spouse
muses [< Grk, mousa, art] - the embodiments and sponsors of performed metrical speech; the mythical daughters of Zeus and Mnemosyne; Calliope (epic poetry), Clio (history), Erato (lyric poetry), Euterpe (song and elegiac poetry), Melpomene (tragedy), Polyhymnia (hymns), Terpsichore (dance), Thalia (dance), Urania (astronomy)
musette ?
mushin [< Jap, absence of mind] (mushin no shin) - a mind not fixed or occupied by thought or emotion and thus open to everything
mythopoiesis ?
nadir -
nanar - un film tellement mal réaliseé et ridicule qui'il en devient involontairement amusant et comique
nanodijkstra - (jocular computer science) a measurement of arrogance
nary -
nastic [< Grk nastos, close-pressed < nassein, to press] - of, relating to, or constituting a movement of a plant part caused by disproportionate growth or increase of turgor in one surface
national syndicalism - an adaptation of syndicalism to suit the social agenda of integral nationalism
nabob - 1. a governor in India under the Mogul Empire; 2. a person of wealth and influence
narratology -
natter - to talk idly; chatter
nebbish - weak-willed or timid
necromimesis -
necromorphous -
negentropy -
nel mezzo del cammin di nostra vita - the incipit of Dante's Inferno
neoflect -
neolexia -
nepenthe (ni 'pen thee) [< Grk, ne-, not + penthos, grief] - something, such as a drink or drug, capable of making one forget suffering
netocracy - [coined by the editorial board of the magazine Wired in the early 90s] - a perceived global upper-class that bases its pwer on a technological advantage and networking skills
neutropenia - an abnormal decrease in the number of neutrophils in the blood
neutrophil - a type of granular white blood cell
Newton's flaming lazer sword (Alder's razor) - 'What cannot be settled by experimentation is not worth debating.'
nibling - a niece or nephew
niddah -
niddick -
nidus (pl: nidi; niduses) (nie' dus) - 1. a nest or breeding place; esp., a place or substance in an animal or plant where bacteria or other organisms lodge and multiply; 2. a place where something originates, develops, or is located
Niflheim [mist + home, abode, word] - one of the Nine Worlds in Norse mythology; a realm of primordial ice and cold with nine frozen rivers inhabited by the Hrimthursar and the Niflungar (or Nibelungs)
night-watchman state - (n) a form of government in political philosophy where the state's only legitimate function is the protection of individuals from assault, theft, breach of contract, and fraud, and the only legitimate governmental institutions are the military, police, and courts. In the broadest sense, it also includes various civil service and emergency-rescue departments (such as the fire departments), prisons, the executive, the judiciary, and the legislatures as legitimate government functions
nihilarian -
nim - to steal; pilfer
nimiety [< L, nimius, too much < nimis, too much] - excess; redundancy
nimptopsical -
nociception -
noisome - 
nomothete - 1. a lawgiver; legislator; 2. a name giver (e.g., Legislator Adam, the namer of animals)
nomothetic - 1. of or relating to lawmaking; legislative; 2. based on a system of law; 3. of or relating to the philosophy of law
nomothetic fallacy - the belief that naming a problem effectively solves it
nonce term - a lexeme created for a single occasion to solve an immediate problem of communication or "an invented or accidental linguistic form, used only once" (e.g., a 'wug' test to determine linguistic development)
nonius -
noocracy (aristocracy of the wise) [< Grk noos, genitive of nous, mind, intelliect] -
noosphere - the sphere of human consciousness and mental activity esp. in regard to its influence on the biosphere and in relation to evolution
nonpareil (nän pu rel') - 1. (adj) having no equal; 2. (n) an individual of unequaled excellence; paragon; 2. a) a small flat disk of chocolate covered with white sugar pellets; b) sugar in small pellets of various colors
normcore - a trend in which ordinary, unfashionable clothing is worn as a deliberate fashion statement
nosegay -
nosism - the practice of using plural 1st-person pronouns to refer to oneself
nostrum - 1. a medicine whose effectiveness is unproved and whose ingredients are usually secret; a quack remedy; 2. a favorite but usually ineffective remedy for problems or evils
Notarikon [< Gk, Latin notarius, stenographer]  - a method of deriving a word by using each of its intial or final letters to stand for another
nuc [abbrev. of 'nucleus colony'] - a small bee colony created from a larger colony
nuclear isomer - (n) a nuclide characterized by pairs of homo-isotopic atoms but of different energy states
nucleon - (n) a hadronic component of a nucleus
nuclide - (n) an atomic species characterized by the specific constitution of its nucleus
nugacity - triviality; futility
nullius in verba [< Horace: Nullius addictus iurare in werba magistri, quo me cumque rapit tempestas, deferor hospes] - to the words of no one
numeraire -
nuncheon - a noon drink
nurdle - a dab of toothpaste
nutation - the nodding motion in the axis of rotation of a largely axially symmetric object; the change in the second Euler angle of a body
nutriment -
nyctinasty -
obambulate - to wander or walk about in an aimless fashion
obelus - the division sign
obiter dictum [< L obiter, in passing] - a comment made while delivering a judicial opinion, but, although possibly persuasive, is unnecessary to the decision in the case and therefore not precedential
oblivion -
oblivious -
obscurantist -
obstreperous - 1. clamorous; noisily unruly or aggressive; 2. stubbornly resistant to control
occlude -
ocellated -
ochlocracy - government by the masses; mob rule
Ockham's broom [coined by Sydney Brenner] - an implicit scientific practice of ignoring inconvenient facts or and instance of this practice
octotych -
ocuplania - letting one's eyes wander while assessing someone's charms
oeillade -
offertory - 1. a) one of the principal parts of the Eucharistic liturgy at which bread and wine are offered to God by the celebrant; b) a musical setting for this part of the liturgy; 2. a collection of offerings at a religious service
officious -
ogdoad [< Grk ogdoos, eigth < okto, eight] - 1. a thing made of eight parts; [Gnosticism or Egyptian mythology] 2. a group of eight divine beings or of eight aeons; 3. the seat of rule of the higher archon and his son
oligodactyly - the condition of having too few digits
omnipotence paradox -
omnishambles -
omphaloskepsis (om fe lo 'skep sis) - navel-gazing
oneiric - (a) of, relating to, or suggestive of dreams
oneirodynia -
oneirology [< Grk, oneiros, dream] - the scientific study of dreams
open-question argument - a philosophical argument put forward by GE Moore to refute the equating of goodness with non-moral properties, whether naturalistic (e.g., pleasure) or metaphysical (e.g., God's command); the syllogistic modus tollens: Premise 1. if x is good, then the question 'is it true that x is good?' is meaningless; Premise 2. the question 'is it true that x is good?' is not meaningless (i.e., it's an open question); Conclusion: x is not good.
ophidian -
ophidiology - a branch of herpetology focused on snakes
ophiology - ophidiology
opisthenar - 1. (n) the back of the hand; 2. (adj) pertaining to the back of the hand
orarian -
orchidaceous - 1. like an orchid; 2. ostentatious; gaudy
ordalium - trial by ordeal
orderly -
orgiastic
orgillous - orgulous
orgulous - proud; haughty
orogeny (orogenesis) [< Gk, oros, mountain] - the process of mountain creation
oronym - 
orotund -
orphrey [< Old Fr., orfreis < L., auriphrygium] - gold or other rich embroidery, esp. on clerical vestments
orrery - an apparatus showing the relative positions and motions of bodies in the solar system by balls moved by a clockwor
ort - scrap of food; morsel
orthosis -
os clitoridis - a bone found in the clitoris of some animals
ostensible - 1. intended for display; 2. being such in appearance; plausible rather than demonstrably true or real
ostension -
ostensive - 1. ostensible [2]; of, relating to, or constituting definition by exemplifying the thing or quality being defined
ostensive definition - the elucidation of the meaning of a term by use of examples
ostentorium - a monstrance
ostinato [< Ital., stubborn] - a motif or phrase that persistently repeats in the same musical voice, usually at the same pitch
otiant - taking one's ease; idling; indolent
otiose -
oubliette -
ouroboros -
outré - deviating from what is usual or proper
overtone -
Overton window - the range of ideas that the public will accept
overweening - 1. presumptuously arrogant; overbearing (e.g., had a witty but overweening manner) ; 2. excessive; immoderate; exaggerated (e.g., overweening ambition)
oxytone [< Gk, oxytonos] - a word the primary stress of which is on the last syllable
pablum - pabulum (3)
pabulum [< L, pascere, to feed] - 1. food; esp. a suspension of nutrients for absorption; 2. intellectual sustenance; 3. sth (such as writing or speech) that is insipid, simplistic, or bland
pace - deferentially contrary to the opinion of
paideia - (n) the rearing and education of children so that they become ideal members of a polis; such cultivation incorporates both theoretical instruction and socialization
paillard (pie' yar) - a piece of beef or veal usually pounded thin and grilled
palantine -
palaver -
paleography - the study of ancient documents in general
Parlemo Technical Impact Hazard Scale - a logarithmic scale used by astronomers to rate the potential hazard of impact of a near-earth object
palliative -
pamprodactyly - four digits forward
panenka - skill move used when taking a penalty kick wherein the player taking the penalty delicately chips the ball over a diving goalkeeper, rather than striking the ball firmly, as is the norm
pangram [holoalphabetic sentence] - a sentence using every letter of an alphabet
panopticon -
pantheraphobia - fear of or aversion to one's mother-in-law
papal bull - a type of letter patent issued by a pope of the catholic church
paphian -
papilionaceious -
parabasis - the part of an Ancient Greek comedy in which the actors leave the stage and the chorus addresses the audience directly
paragoge - a type of vocalic epenthesis
parashah (pl: parashot, parashoth) [< Hebrew, section, division] - 1. a portion of the Torah chanted or read each week, usually on the sabbath
pareidolia - the tendency to interpret a vague stimulus as something known to the observer, such as interpreting marks on Mars as canals, seeing shapes in clouds, or hearing hidden messages in music
parenchyma [< Gkr, parenkhuma, visceral flesh < parenkein, to pour in beside] - 1. the tissue characteristic of an organ, as distinguished from associative connective or supporting tissue
paresthesia - a skin sensation, such as prickling, itching, or tingling, with no apparen cause
parhelic - of or relating to parhelia
parhelion (parhelium) - a bright spot sometimes appearing on either side of the sun, often on a luminous ring or halo
patter [< 'Pater Noster'] -
patter song - a vocal musical composition that is characterized by a moderately fast to ver fast tempo with a rapid succession of rhythmic patterns in which each syllable corresponds to one note
parhelion -
pari passu -
parallax [< Grk, prallaxis, alteration] - a displacement or difference in the apparent position of an object viewed along two different lines of sight and is measured by the angle or semi-angle of inclination between those two lines
paroxytone - a word the primary stress of which is on the penultimate syllable
parsec [< PARallax of one arcSECond] [pc] - an astronomical unit of distance that is the inverse of the annual parallax of one second -- that is, the apparent measured difference in the position of a star as seen from earth and another hypothetical observer at the sun; 1 pc = 3.26 light-years
participial - of, relating to, consisting of, or formed with a participle
parturient - 1. bringing forth or about to bring forth young; 2. of or relating to parturition
parturition - the act or process of childbirth
parturiunt montes; nascetur riduculus mus - the mountains are in labor, and a ridiculous mouse will be brought forth.
parvenu -
parvenuism -
parvis (parvise) - 1. a court or enclosed space before a building (as like a church); 2. a single portico or collonade before a church
parvitude - 1. an extremely small or minute thing; atom; 2. the quality or state of being small; smallness
passel -
pavage -
PC bang - a gaming café, esp. in South Korea
peccavi (pek 'ah vee) - an admission of sin or guilt
peculate -
pedeconference - a meeting done while the participants walk
peen - the side opposite a hammer's striking side
peladophobia - fear of or aversion to baldness or bald persons
peloton [< Fr., little ball or platoon; cognate to Eng. pellet] - 1. a platoon; 2. the main group of riders formed during a cycling road race
peltast - a type of light infantry in ancient Greece who served as skirmishers
Peltzman effect - the hypothesized tendency of people to react to a safety regulation by increasing other risky behavior, offsetting
peneplane - (n) a more-or-less level land surface representing an advanced stage of erosion undisturbed by crustal movements
Penrose process - extraction of energy from a rotating black hole
pentatych -
penumbra -
penury - 1. extreme want or povery; destitution; 2. extreme dearth; barrenness or insufficiency
peremptory [< L, per + emere, to take] - (a) 1.a) putting an end to or precluding a right of action, debate, or delay; specifically, not providing an opportunity to show cause why one should not comply (e.g., a peremptory mandamus); b) admitting of no contradiction; 2. expressive of urgency or command (e.g., peremptory call); 3.a) characterized by often imperious or arrogant self-assurance; b) indicative of a peremptory attitude or nature; haughty
perennate ('pur u naet) - (vi) to live over from one growing season to another
perfect binder -
perfecti -
perfervid - marked by overwrought or exaggerated emotion; excessively fervent
perficient [< L, perficiens, performing] - (a) 1. making or doing thoroughly; efficient; effectual; 2. (n). one who performs or perfects a work; 3. (n) one who endows a charity
perfin - (n) 1. a perforated initial; a series of small holes punched into a stamp and forming a letter, series of letters or other design for the purpose of preventing the unauthorized use of the stamps; 2. a stamp marked with perforated initials
perfit -
perflate -
perflatile -
perfoliate -
perforable -
perforce - 1. (obsolete) by physical coercion; 2. by force of circumstances
per formam doni - in accordance with the terms of the gift;  ...
perfunctory -
perigee -
perineum [< Grk, perineos, perineum] - a region of the human body between the scrotum and the anus or between the vagina and the anus
peripatetic -
perispomenon [< Grk, pronounced with a circumflex] - a word in ancient Greek that has a circumflex accent on the last syllable
permille -
permyryiad (basis point) - a unit equal to one hundredth of a percentage point
personal union -
pestiferous - 1. producing or breeding infectious disease; 2. infected with or contaminated by an epidemic disease; 3. morally evil or deadly; pernicious
petechia - a small red or purple spot on the body, caused by a minor hemorrhage
petrichor -
petrine - 1. a person who is guided by materialism and is usually disdainful of intellectual or artistic values; 2. a person who is uninformed in a special area of knowledge
phaneromania -
Phanerozoic (fan u ru zo' ik) [< Grk φανερkoς, visible + ζωη, life] - of, relating to, or being an eon of geologic time that comprises the Paleozoic, Mesozoic, and Cenozoic or the corresponding systems of rocks
phatic - of, relating to, or being speech used to share feelings or establish a mood of sociability rather than to communicate information or ideas
philippic - 1. any of the orations of Demosthenes against Philip of Macedon; 2. any of the orations of Cicero against Antony; 3. a verbal denunciation characterized by harsh, often insulting language; a tirade
philistine -
philoprnist -
philosophaster - a pretender to philosophy; a petty or charlatan philosopher
philtrum -
phlegmatic -
phonetic reversal - the process of reversing the phonemes or phones of a word or phrase
phono-semantic matching -
phrontistery - a thinking place
piacular - 1. making expiation or atonement for a sacrilege (e.g., piacular sacrifice); 2. requiring expiation; wicked or blameworthy
piastre - piece of eight
Pigovian tax - a tax applied to market activities that generate negative externalities
pilcrow -
pilish - a style of writing in which the lengths of consecutive words match the digits of the number π (pi)
pilgarlick - a poor wretch [used whimsically and self-pityingly to refer to onself]
pillory -
pinna [< L, wing or fin] - the visible part of the ear (other than the exterior auricular meatus -- the ear canal)
pittance -
pizzicato -
placeman - 1. a person who holds a public office, esp. for private profit and as a reward for political support [e.g., American ambassadors]
plaguy ?
planchette (plan shet') - a small triangular board supported by two casters and a vertical pencil that, when lightly touched by the fingertips, is said to spell out subconscious or supernatural messages
plantar -
plantigrade locomotion - a manner of walking such that the podials and metatarsals are flat on the ground
plasmodium - 1. A multinucleate mass of cytoplasm formed by the aggregation of a number of amoeboid cells, as that characteristic of the vegetative phase of the slime molds. 2. A protozoan of the genus Plasmodium, which includes the parasites that cause malaria.
plastic - (adj) 
plastron [< piastre] - 1. a metal breastplate worn under a coat of mail; 2. a quilted pad worn by fencers to protect the torso and side; 3. a trimming on the front of a bodice; 4. the ventral part of the shell; 5. a think film of air held by water-repellent hairs of some aquatic insects; 6. dickey
platisher [http://recode.net/2014/02/07/rise-of-the-platishers/] - an organization that provides a tech platform that can host the projects and publications of users and that itself publishes content on the platform (e.g., BuzzFeed, Gawker, Medium, Sulia, Vox)
platitude -
platypyguous -
plebiscite -
pleionosis - the state of having an overly inflated appraisal of one's own importance
plonk -
plumage -
pluralis excellentiae - an intensive plural; the use of plurals in classical Hebrew to refer to objects or abstract entities while amplifying their properties
pluralis majestatis - the 'royal we'
pluralis modestiae - a practice in scientific literature of an author's referring to him/herself as 'we'
pluton - a body of igneous rock formed beneath the surface of the earth by consolidation of magma
pococurante -
po-faced - having a serious expression on the face; too serious
poikilotherm [< Gr, poikilos, varied] - an organism whose internal temperature varies considerably
polarity item - a lexical item that can appear only in environments associated with a particular grammatical polarity
polearm -
polemic -
pollex -
poltroon - an ignoble or total coward; a dastard; a mean-spirited wretch
polyptych [<Gk ptyche, fold] - a panel painting that is divided into sections and that has one primary central panel
polytely - the presence of multiple simultaneous goals
ponophobia -
Pons asinorum [L, bridge of donkeys] (also: Elefuga) - 1. Euclid's fifth proposition (the theorem on isosceles triangles); 2. the middle term of a syllogism; 3. Ricardo's Law of Rent
Postel's law - a principle of conservative action and liberal interaction
postilion - 1. one who rides the near horse of the leaders to guide the horses drawing a coach; 2. a rider mounted on the near, leading horse pulling a carriage who guides a team; 3. one who rides and guides the first pair of horses of a coach or post chaise; 4. one who rides one of the horses when only one pair is used; 5. a post-boy; one who rides a post-horse; a guide or forerunner
potage - a thick creamy soup
pottage - a thick soup or stew
pouf -
poultice - cataplasm
poy [< Old Fr, poi, small hill < L. podium] - 1. a support structure; 2. a balancing pole used by rope dancers; 3. a long pole, normally used with a hook, used to push barges upstream
practicum - a school or college course, esp. one in a specialized field of study, that is designed to give students supervised practical application of previously studied theory
prandial - during or pertaining to dinner
prastuphulic -
prate -
precariat - those trapped in low-skilled, low-pay, insecure jobs; young people with few qualifications competing for an evaporating pool of unskilled work
precession - a change in the orientation of the rotational axis of a rotating body; change in the first Euler angle of a body
precinct -
preface - an introduction to a book or other literary work written by the work's author
preferential attachment process -
prelate [< L praeferre] - a high-ranking Christian priest (e.g., bishop, cardinal, etc.); an ecclesiastic (as a bishop or abbot) of superior ran
prepuce - foreskin or a loose fold of skin covering the glans clitoridis
prescript - 1. (n) something prescribed, especially a rule or regulation of conduct; 2. (a) having been established as a rule; prescribed
prestidigitation - 
pretermit - 1. to leave undone; neglect; 2. to let pass without mention or notice; omit; 3. to suspend indefinitely (e.g., the grand jury voted to pretermit the case)
principle of explosion [ex contradictione sequitur quodlibet; principle of Pseudo-Scotus] - a law of classical logic according to which any statement can be proved from a contradiction
prior art -
privative -
procatalepsis [< Grk katalambanein, to seize] - a figure of speech characterized by a speaker's raising objections to the thesis before the audience can
problemist - 
procellous -
proem -
profiterole - a small round cream puff; a small hollow case of choux pastry with a filling
profligate -
pro forma -
program chrestomathy [coined by Eric S. Raymond] - a collection of similar programs written in various languages or frameworks
programmable matter -
proleptic - 1. of a calendar, extrapolated to dates prior to its first adoption; of those used to adjust to or from the Julian calendar or Gregorian calendar; 2. describing an event as having been assigned a date that is too early; 3. anticipating and answering objections before they have been raised; procataleptic
promenade [< Fr promener, to take for walk < pro + mener, to lead] - 1. (vi) to take or go on a promenade; 2. (vi) to perform a promenade in a dance; 3. (vt) to walk about in or on; 4. (n) a place for strolling; 5. (n) a leisurely walk or ride esp. in a public pace for pleasure or display; 6.a) a ceremonious opening of a formal ball consisting of a grand march of all the guests; b) a figure in a square dance in which couples move counterclockwise in a circle
promession - disposing of human remains by freeze-drying
proparoxytone - a word the primary stress of which is on the antepenultimate syllable
properispomenon - a word in ancient Greek that has a circumflex accent on the penultimate syllable
propolis - a resinous substance collected from the buds of certain trees by bees and used as a cement or sealant in the construction of their hives
proprioception -
proscenium - 1. the area of a modern theater that is located between the curtain and the orchestra; 2. the stage of an ancient theater, located between the background and the orchestra; 3. a proscenium arch
protean -
prothesis - a type of metaplasm; the addition of a sound or syllable at the beginning of a word without changing its meaning
protium - (n) the most prevalent isotope of hydrogen
provender -
provenance - 1. origin, source; 2. the history of ownership of a valued obejct or work of art or literature
provenience -
providence - 1. a) (often capitalized) divine guidance or care; b) (capitalized) God conceived as the power sustaining and guiding human destiny; 2. the quality or state of being provident
provident - 1. making provision for the future; prudent; 2. frugal; saving
psalmody -
psalter -
psilos (plural: psiloi) [<Grk, bare, stripped] - ancient Greek light infantry who acted as skirmishers and missiliers
psoa ?
ptosis [< Grk, ptosis, falling] - the drooping of a body part
pullet -
pulsatile - undergoing pulsation; vibration; rhythmic beating; throbbing
punt - the indentation at the bottom of a wine bottle
purpureal -
pusillanimous - lacking courage and resolution
pussyvan - a flurry; a temper
putrify -
pygal -
pygalgia -
pygephanous -
Pygmalion effect [Rosenthal effect] - the phenomenon whereby people perform better when greater expectation is placed upon them
pygophilous -
pyknick - 
pyrexia -
pyroclast
Pythagorean comma - the small interval existing in Pythagorean tuning between two enharmonically equivalent notes (about 23.46 cents, or roughly a quarter of a semitone); (the difference between a Pythagorean apotome and a Pythagorean limma)
pyx - box or vessel in which coins or consecrated eucharist are kept
qadi -
qua - in the character or role of (someone or something)
quadragenairan -
quaff - 1. (vt) to drink (a beverage) heartily (e.g., quaffed the ale with gusto); 2. (vi) to drink a liquid heartily (e.g., quaffed from the spring); 3. (n) a hearty draft of liquid
quaquaversal - facing or pointing in every direction
quarrel (bolt) [< Fr, carré] - the ammunition or arrow used in crossbows
quasar (quasi-stellar radio source) - the most energetic and distant member of the class of active galactic nuclei; a compact region that is in the center of a massive galaxy and that surrounds a supermassive black hole
quash [< Anglo-French quasser (casser) < L quassare, to shake violently, shatter (frequentative of quatere, to shake)] - to suppress or extinguish summarily and completely (e.g., to quash a rebellion)
quasi-quotation - string interpolation such that the placeholders to be expanded are objects that can be concatenated (e.g., string characters)
quatopygia -
queem (queme) [< OE, cweman, to gratify, please] 1. (obsolete) to be pleasing; 2. (poetic) to please; satisfy; 3. to bequeath; 4. to hand over privately; slip (e.g., to queem a thing into one's hand); 5. (obsolete) pleasure
quell - 1. to thoroughly overwhelm and reduce to submission or passivity (e.g., quell a riot); 2. to quiet or pacify (e.g., quell fears)
quemful - (obsolete) becoming; fit; attractive
quibble -
quiescent -
quincunx -
quidnunc -
quine - a non-empty computer program which takes no input and produces a copy of its own source code as its only output
quink -
quire - a collection of 24 or sometimes 25 sheets of paper of the same size and quality; 1/20 of a ream
quisquous [or should this be 'quisguous'?] - perplexing, puzzling
quoad ?
quoad hoc - to this extent
quodlibet - 1. a form of music with melodies in counterpart; 2. a form of trompe-l'œil which realisitically renders domestic items (playing cards, etc.); 3. a mode of philosophical debate popular in the Middle Ages, in which any question could be posed extemporaneously; 4.a) a philosophical or theological point proposed for disputaton; b) a disputation on such a point; 5. a whimsical combination of familiar melodies or texts
quodlibetarian - one who discusses any subject at pleasure
quoin -
quoll - a carnivorous marsupial of Australia
quos deus vult perdere prius dementat - those whom a god wishes to destroy, he first drives mad
quot homines, tot sententiae - there are as many opinions as there are men
quo vadis? - whither are you going?
rabona - method of kicking the soccerball whereby the kicking leg is wrapped around the back of the standing leg
raffiné - refined; sophisticated
raffish - 1. characterized by careless unconventionality; rakish; 2. low-class; disreputable; vulgar
rakish -
rampike -
rangerine -
raphe (rei' fee) [< Grk, raphe, seam] - a ridged union (seam) of continuous biological tissue
rapier - a slender sword
Rashomon effect - the state or effect of contradictory interpretations of the same events by different persons
rapprochement -
Rassenkreis (ring species) - a connected series of neighbouring populations, each of which can interbreed with closely sited related populations, but for which there exist at least two "end" populations in the series, which are too distantly related to interbreed, though there is a potential gene flow between each "linked" population
ratio decidendi - the point in a case that determines the judgement; the principle that a case establishes; a legal rule derived from and consistent with those parts of legal reasoning within a judgment on which the outcome of the case depends
rat king - a number of rats intertwined at their tails because of blood, sap, dirt, feces, etc.
rattachism - a movement in francophone Belgium that advocates for unification of Wallonia with France
raven paradox -
razor - a principle or rule of thumb that allows one to eliminate unlikely explanations for a phenomenon
rebbes -
recalcitrant -
recapitulate -
recension - 1. a critical revision of a text incorporating the most plausible elements found in varying sources; 2. a text so revised
réclame (rei kläm') - 1. a gift for dramatization or publicity; showmanship; 2. public acclaim (e.g., the play won critical réclame)
recognizance - 1. a) an obligation of record entered into before a court or magistrate requiring the performance of an act (as appearance in court) usually under penalty of a money forfeiture (e.g., released on his own recognizance); b) the sum liable to forfeiture upon such an obligation; 2. token, pledge
reconquista - a reconquest; specifically, the regaining of Spain by the Spaniards from the Moors in the fifteenth century
recto and verso -
redivivus (red i 'vee vus) [< L., red-, again + vivus, alive] - resuscitated, revivified
red-letter day - any day of significance but originally holy days and saints' days
redoubt -
redoubtable -
redound -
reculer pour mieux sauter - to draw back in order to make a better jump
refection [< L, reficere, to restore] - 1. refreshment of mind, spirit, or body; 2. a) the taking of refreshment; b) food and drink together; repast; 3. satisfaction of hunger and thirst; 4. recovery of vitamins by consumption of feces (b/c of enrichment by bacteria)
refocillation -
refulgent - radiant, resplendent, or brilliant
regolith ?
reformicon [pormanteau: reform + conservative] -
re infecta - without accomplishing one's purpose
Reisevorfreudekribbeln - a particular tingle that one feels just before departing for uncertain territory
religio loci - religious sanctity of a place
rem acu tetigisti - 'you have touched the point with a needle' -- that is, you have hit the nail on the head
remand -
renitent - 1. resistant to physical pressure; not pliant; 2. reluctant to yield or be swayed; recalcitrant
rent (economic rent) - any payment to a factor of production in excess of the cost needed to bring that factor into production (because of natural or social exclusivity)
rentier -
repast -
replevin - a legal action to recover personal property unlawfully taken; the writ or procedure of such action
requerimiento - a written declaration of sovereignty and war by Spanish military forces over the Americas
resect -
resistentialism - the seemingly spiteful behavior shown by inanimate objects
respond - 1. (n) an engaged pillar supporting an arch or closing a collonade or arcade
ressentiment - deep-seated resentment, frustration, and hostility accompanied by a sense of being powerless to express those feelings directly
resultant - a single vector that is the equivalent of a set of vectors
ret ?
retrobulbar -
revenant - 1. one that returns after a lengthy absence; 2. one who returns after death
reverse mathematics - a program in mathematical logic that seeks to determine the axioms necessary to prove theorems 
revetment - a sloping structure placed on banks or cliffs so to absorb the energy of incoming water
reynard - a male fox; a (male?) dog; a (male?) tod
rhadamanthine (rad e 'man thine) - like a stern judge; rigorously just and severe
rhapsody [< Grk, rhapsoidia, recitation of selections from epic poetry < rhaptein, to sew, stitch + aidein, to sing] - 1. a portion of an epic poem adapted for recitation; 2. (archaic) a miscellaneous collection; 3.a) a highly emotional utterance; a highly emotional literary work; effusively rapturous or extravagant discourse; b) rapture, ecstasy; 4. a musical composition of irregular for having an improvisatory character
rhapsodic - 1. extravagantly emotional; rapturous; 2. resembling or characteristic of a rhapsody
rhinotillexomania -
rhytiscopia -
rhotacism -
ribald -
risible -
risorgimento - a political and social movement that agllomerated different Italian states into a single Italian kingdom in the 19th century
ritornello - 1. a short recurrent instrumental passage in a vocal composition; 2. an instrumental interlude in early opera; 3. a tutti pasage in a concerto or rondo refrain
rococo - 1. a style of art (esp. architecture and decorative art) that originated in early 18th-c. France; marked by elaborate ornamentation; 2. an ornate style of speech or writing; 3. (music) an extension of baroque music of 18th-c France, characterized by ornamentation and lightness of expression
roil -
roinous -
rorqual (razorback) - (n) any of several baleen whales of the family Balaenopteridae having longitudinal grooves on the throat and a small, pointed dorsal fin
roscoe -
roseate - 1. resembling a rose, esp in color; 2. overly optimistic
rosette -
rostrum - 1. a dais or pulpit; 2. a curved, beaklike prow of an ancient Roman war galley
rouse -
rubato - 1. (n) rhythmic flexibility within a phrase or measure; a relaxation of strict time; 2. (adj) containing or characterized by rubato
rubrification - the addition of red headings by medieval scribes to mark the end of one section of a manuscript and the beginning of another
ruffian -
Rumspringa [< Grm, herumspringen, to jump around] - a period of adolescence for some members of the Amish that begins around the age of 14–16 and ends when a youth chooses baptism within the Amish church or instead leaves the community
saccharine -
sachet - 1. a small bag or packet; 2. a small bag containing a perfumed powder or potpourri used to scent clothes and linens; 3. a small disposable bag or pouch used to contain single-use quantities of foods or consumer goods such as ketchup or shampoo
sackbut (< Middle French, sacquer, to push + bouter, to pull) - a brass sliding instrument of the Renaissance and Baroque Era
sackcloth - 1. a coarse cloth of goat or camel's hair or of flax, hemp, or cotton; 2. a garment of sackcloth worn as a sign of mourning or penitence
Saint Alban - patron saint of Great Britain
Saint Andrew - patron saint of Scotland
Saint David - patron saint of Wales
Saint George - patron saint of England
sallow -
samovar [< Russian, self + cook/boil/brew] - a cooking vessel that boils or brews
samsara -
sandhi [< Sanskrit samdhi, placing together] - modification of the sound of a morpheme conditioned by syntactic context in which it is uttered
sanguinary - 1. bloodthirsty, murderous; 2. attended by bloodshed; 3. consisting of blood (e.g., a sanguinary stream)
sanguine - 1. blood-red; 2. consisting of or relating to blood; 3. bloodthirsty, sanguinary; 4. [of the complexion] ruddy; 5. sturdy, colorful, cheerful; 6. confident; optimistic
Sanhedrin -
sapient -
sapphic - 1. of or relating to the Greek lyric poet Sappho; 2. of, relating to, or consisting of a 4-line strophe chiefly comprising trochaic and dactylic feet; 3. lesbian
satori [< Jap satoru, to know, understand] - kensho; enlightenment; bodhi; prajna; buddhahood
savart - a unit of measure for sound frequency ratio of sounds such that 1 savart = 1/300 octaves
savate - a form of French martial art
saxicolous -
sax spiral; sachs spiral (spelling?) [mine: the Death Star spiral]
sawceror - one who plays the singing saw
scaramouche - !. a stock character in the Italian commedia dell'arte that burlesques the Spanish don and is characterized by boastfullness and cowardice; 2. a) a cowardly buffoon; b) rascal, scamp
scarlet day - red-letter day
scherzo [< Italian, joke, play] - a movement of a piece of music that is performed in a playful manner
schizodactyly - the condition of grasping and clinging with the second and third digit (rather than thumb and second digit)
schmaltzy
Schopenhauer ending -
scienter - (law) 1. (adv) deliberately or knowingly; 2. the intent to do wrongdoing or knowledge of the wrongness of an act
scissor door - a car door that rotates vertically at a fixed hinge at the front of the door
sclerotic - 1. of or pertaining to the sclera; 2. having or relating to sclerosis; 3. uncompromising, fixed, closed-minded, and insular
scopophobia -
scofflaw -
Scottish verdict - a verdict indicating that insufficient evidence had been presented for conviction
scoville heat unit -
scree - loose rock debris covering a slope; a slope of loose rock debris at the base of a steep incline or cliff
scrip -
scrivener - 1. a professional or public copyist or writer; scribe; 2. notary public
scroop - the rustling sound of silk
scrumping -
scuddle - to run with an affected haste [done perhaps principally by actors?]
scuttle - (n) 1) a small opening or hatch with a movable lid in the deck or hull of a ship or in the roof, wall, or floor of a building; 2) the lid or hatch of such an opening; (v)  3) [Nautical] to cut or open a hole or holes in (a ship's hull). 
scuttlebutt -
secondment - the temporary transfer of a person from his or her normal duty to another assignment
seedbed - 1. soil or a bed of soil prepared for planting seed; 2. a place or source of growth or development
selcouth [< Old Eng, seldan, seldom + cuth, known] - strange, unfamiliar, marvelous
selfdom - selfhood
selfsame - being the same; identical
selvage (selvedge) - 1. a) the edge of a fabric that is woven so that it will not fray or ravel; b) an ornamental fringe at either end of an oriental rug; 2. the edge plate of a lock that has a slot for a bolt; 3. any similar strip or part of surplus material, as around a sheet of postage stamps.
seme - the smallest unit of meaning recognized in semantics, one which refers to a single characteristic of a sememe
sememe - a proposed unit of transmitted or intended meaning in structural semiotics; it is atomic or indivisible
semordilap [reversal of 'palindrome'] [also volvograms, heteropalindromes, mynoretahs, anadromes] - a word or phrase, the written representation of which, when backwards, represents a different word or phrase
senary - having 6-arity
seneschal - a steward in charge of a medieval nobleman's estate
sepulchral -
seraglio - 1. a large harem; 2. a sultan's palace; serai
serai - a sultan's palace
sexton - a manager of church property
shaggy-dog = 1. of, relating to, or being a long-drawn-out circumstantial story concerning an inconsequential happening that impresses the teller as humorous or interesting but the hearer as boring and pointless; 2. of, relating to, or being a humorous story whose humor lies in the pointlessness or irrelevance of the punchline
shamble - to walk awkwardly with draggind feet; shuffle; to walk in an awkward, unsteady way without lifting your feet very high off the ground
shambolic - [British slang] disorderly or chaotic
shibboleth -
shiftless [shift = resourcefulness] - lacking in resourcefulness; inefficient; 2. lacking in ambition or incentive; lazy
shofar -
shokunin - a craftsman, usually an artisan of manual crafts
shoshin - an attitude of openness and eagerness as well as a lack of preconceptions, esp. when at an advanced level 
shuriken -
sicarian -
sidereal -
sigil (pl: sigils, sigilia) [< L, sigillum, small sign] - a symbol (usually a prefix) that is attached to a variable name to indicate the variable's datatype or scope
sigmatism - a lisp; a speech impediment characterizing a person unable to articulate sibilants
silage -
silent enim leges inter arma [< Cicero, Pro Milone] - For, amidst war, laws fall silent.
sillyhow - a caul; a membrane that in some cases covers the head of a newborn child
simoom -
simpatico - 1. of like mind or temperament; compatible; 2. having attractive qualities; pleasing
simper - (n) 1. a silly, self-conscious, often coy smile; (v) 2. to smile in a silly, self-conscious, often coy manner; 3. to utter or express with a silly, self-conscious, often coy smile; 4. to say (sth) in a way that is not sincere or natural
simplex dictum - an unproved or dogmatic statement
Singspiel -
sinistral -
sinology -
sinter - 1. a chemical sediment or crust, as of porous silica, deposited by a mineral spring; 2. a mass formed by sintering; 3. to cause (e.g., metallic powder) to form a coherent mass by heating without melting
sirdar - a person of high rank, esp. in India
siren song -
sisal -
sitophobia -
sitzfleisch - a person's buttocks
skaldic -
skete -
skeuomorphism (< Gk, skeuos, container) - a derivative object that retains ornamental design cues from structures that were necessary in the original
skewbald - (of horses) marked with patches of white and non-black colors
skirling - 1. (vi) to produced a high, shrill, wailing tone, as like the sound of a bagpipe; 2. (vt) to play (a piece) on a bagpipes; 3. (n) the shrill sound made by the chanter pipe of bagpipes; 4. (n) a shrill wailing sound
skive -
skullduggery -
skybosh - practical joking or tomfoolery
skysail - a square sail set above the royal on a square-rigger; 2. a triangualar sial set between the trucks of a racing schooner
slactivism - actions performed via the internet in support of a political or social cause but regarded as requiring little time or involvement (e.g., signing an online petition or joining a campaign group on a social-media website)
slake -
slattern -
sloane's gap -
small bore -
smaragd - (n) emerald; any green gemstone as like the emerald
smaragdine (smu rag' deen) [< Grk, smaragdos, emerald] - 1. of or relating to emeralds; 2. having the color of emeralds; 3. (n) emerald
smatchet -
smoothbore -
snood - 1. a small netlike cap worn by women to keep the hair in place; 2. a headband or fillet; 3. a fleshy wrinkled fold of skin that hangs down over a turkey's beak
snoutfair - a person with a handsome countenance
snowclone - a type of cliché that uses an old idiom formulaically in a new context (e.g., 'orange is the new black')
snudge - to lie snug or quiet
snuggery - 1. a snug, cozy, comfortable place, position, or room; 2. a very small private room in a pub
sobriquet - 1. an affectionate or humorous nickname; 2. an assumed name [e.g., Mahatma Gandhi; the Big Apple; Genghis Khan; Honest Abe; the Antipodes]
sociocracy - a system of governance, using consent-based decision making among equivalent individuals and an organizational structure based on cybernetic principles
sociotropy - a personality trait (in contrast to autonomy) characterized by excessive investment in interpersonal relationships
Socratic irony - (n) the dissimulation of ignorance practised by Socrates as a means of confuting an adversary
sodality -
sojourn - 1. (v) to reside temporarily; 2. (n) a brief period of residence
solatium (pl: solatia) (so lae' shee um) - a compensation (as money) given as solace for suffering, loss, or injured feelings
solemnize - 1. to celebrate or observe with dignity and gravity; 2. to perform with formal ceremony; 3. to make serious or grave
solrads -
songstress -
sophrosyne - (n) healthy-mindedness, self-restraint, moderation, discretion
soteriology [< Grk. soter, preserver] - theology dealing with salvation, esp. as effected by Jesus Christ
sou -
soubrette -
soul-sick - spiritually ill; dejected or depressed; diseased or distressed in mind or soul; morally diseased
soupçon -
soramimi (< Jap, air ear) (soramimi kahshi (< Jap, misheard lyrics)) - homophonic translation of song lyrics; interpreting lyrics in one language as similar words and phrases of another language
souse - 1. something kept or steeped in brine; 2. a pickle made with salt; 3. an ear; esp. a hog's ear; 4. the act of plunging or steeping in brine; 5. an alcoholic; 6. to immerse in liquid; to steep or drench; 7. (vt) (dialectical) to strike, beat; 8. (vi) (dialectical) to fall heavily
sous-vide - describing a method of cooking, intended to maintain the integrity of ingredients, in which food is heated in airtight bags for an extended period of time at relatively low, but tightly controlled temperatures.
southing - 1. (Navigation) nautical movement, deviation, or distance covered in a southerly direction; 2. (Astronomy) astronomy a south or negative declination
sousveillance - 1. the recording of an activit from the perspective of a participant in the activity, esp. by means of portable personal technologies; 2. monitoring of societal or institutional authorities by those directed by such authorities
sparkline -
Spartan diarchy of the Agiads and Eurypontids - 
Spartan pederasty - 
spatchcock - (v) to insert into text too hurriedly or inappropriately; (n) a fowl stuffed and cooked immediately after killing
spate -
spatial network - a graph in which the vertices or edges are spatial elements associated with geometric objects, i.e. the nodes are located in a space equipped with a certain metric
specter -
spectrophobia - fear of mirrors [however, not necessarily of reflections]
speedrun -
splanchnic -
spoonerism [Rev. Wm. Spooner] - (n) corresponding phonemes or morphemes are switched (see metathesis)
spot market (cash market) - a public financial market in which financial instruments or commodities are traded for immediate delivery (as opposed to a futures market)
Sprechstimme -
spurtle -
squalid -
squamous -
squee - 1. to squeal with excitment or delight; 2. a squeeing cry
stalking horse - 1. a horse used as cover by a hunter stalking game; 2. a candidate put forward instead of any of several potentially successfull candidates in order to initiate a leadership debate, guage feelings, divide opposition, etc.
star lifting - a process by which an advanced civilization removes a substantial portion of a star's matter in a controlled manner for other users
statistical syllogism (proportional syllogism; direct inference)
staysail - an auxiliary sail, often triangular, set to catch the wind, often betweeen two masts (mizzen staysail)
steatopygia -
stellate - arranged or shaped like a star; radiating from a center
Stendhal syndrome (hyperkulturemia) - a psychosomatic disorder characterized by dizziness or fainting when an individual is exposed to art
stentorian - very loud
stereopsis -
stevedore -
sthène [< Gk, sthenos, force] - an obsolete unit of force; 1 sn = 1 kN
stibnite -
stichomythia -
stipple - 1. to draw, engrave, or paint in dots or short strokes; 2. to apply (pain e.g.) in dots or short stokes; 3. to dot, fleck, or speckle
stoic -
stocious -
stolid -
stound - 1. (obsolete) an hour; 2. (obsolete) a tide, season; 3. (archaic or dialectical) a time, length of time; 4. (archaic or dialectical) a brief span of time; instant; moment; 5. a moment or instance of urgency; exigence; 6. a fit, an episode or sudden outburst of emotion; 7. astonishment; amazement; 8. (obsolete or dialectical) to be hurting, be in pain; to mourn; to desire or pine after; 9. a receptacle for holding small beer
stoundmeal [< OE, stund, extent of time + mælum (dative plural of mæl), time] - (archaic) 1. at times; at intervals; from moment to moment; 2. occurring at times or intervals
stour - 1. a stake; 2. a rung of a ladder; 3. a stave in the side of a wagon; 4. a large pole by which barges are propelled against the stream; a poy
stout -
strabismus -
stratovolvano (composite volcano) - a conical volcano that is built up by many layers (strata) of hardened lava, tephra, pumice, and vocanic ash and that is usually characaterized by a steep profile and periodic explosive or effusive eruptions (e.g., Krakatoa and Vesuvius)
streakline - one of a locus of points of all the fluid particles that have passed continuously through the spatial point in the past
streamline - one of a family of curves that are instantaneously tangential to the velocity vector of a flow
stricken [past participle of 'strike'] - 1. struck or wounded, as by a projectile; 2. affected by something overwhelming, such as disease, trouble or painful emotion
stridulate -
Stroop test -
stunod [< Ital, stonato, out of tune] - 1. stupid or crazy; out of touch with reality; disagreeable; 2. a stupid or crazy person
stupa [< Sanskrit, stupa, heap] - a mound-like or hemispherical structure containing Buddhist relics, typically the ashes of Buddhist monks, used as a place of meditation
Sturgeon's law - only about 10% of the output of any collective endeavor has even redeeming value
sublation - 1. ritual purification; 2. aufheben; aufhebung
subordination -
suborn -
substantive -
subsume [< L sumere, to take up] - to inclue or place within something larger or more comprehensive; to encompass as a subordinate or component element (e.g., red, green, and yellow are subsumed under the term 'color')
subtension - a state of an angle such that the rays of the angle traverse a geometric object
suicide door - a car door that is hinged at the rear rather than the front
sukiyaki [< Jap, suki, strip < suku, to be thin, yaku, to roast] - a japanese dish of sliced meat, bean curd, and vegetables fried together
sulcus - 1. a crevice on the surface of a brain; 2. a long groove on a planet or moon; 3. a furrow or fissure
sundog - 1. a parhelion; 2. a small halo or rainbow near the horizon just off the parhelic circle
supercilious - feelign or showing haughty disdaine
superficiate -
superfluity -
superfly - an ostentatious, self-confident person, esp. a black person who is a pusher of drugs
supernumerary - 
supplete -
suppurate - to form or discharge pus
suprematism - an art movement, focused on basic geometric forms, such as circles, squares, lines, and rectangles, painted in a limited range of colors
surcoat - a loose garment without sleeves worn over a suit of armor, sometimes colored or embroidered with the wearer's coat of arms
suzerain -
svengali -
swale - 1. a low track of moist or marshy land; 2. a long narrow and shallow trough between ridges on a beach, running parallel to the coastline; 3. a shallow troughlike depression that is created to carry water during rainstorms or snowmelts; a drainage ditch; 4. a shallow, usually grassy depression sloping downward from a plains upland meadow
swill -
swink - (archaic) - 1. toil, work, drudgery; 2. (vi) to labor, toil; 3. (vt) to cause to toil or drudge; to tire or exhaust with labor
swive - 1. to reap; to cut for harvest; 2. to copulate with (a woman)
symphysis - a fibrocartilaginous fusion between two bones
synalepha (synalœfa) [sin u leef' u; sin ul ee' fu] - the merging of two syllables, esp. two syllables of separate words
syndicalism - a type of economic system such that industries are organized in confederations; a form of communism and economic corporatism that advocates interest aggregation of multiple non-competitive categorized units composed of specialists and representatives of workers in each respective field
synizesis (synaeresisi) - the combination into one syllable of two vowels that do not form a diphthong, of a vowel and a dipthong, or of a vowel and a syllable with degrading consonantal onset
syntenic (sin ten' ik) - located on the same chromosome (e.g., two syntenic genes)
syzygy - 1. either of two points in the orbit of a celestial body where the body is in opposition to or in conjunction with the sun; 2. either of two point in the orbit of the moon when the moon lies in a straight line with the sun and earth; 3. the configuration of the sun, earth, and moon lying in a straight line
tabard - 1. a silk banner attached to a bugle or trumpet; 2. a woman's or girl's sleeveless jerkin or loose overgarment; 3. a cape or tunic worn by a knight, emblazoned wih the coat of arms of his king or queen
tabes - progressive bodily wasting or emaciation
Talmudim -
tampion - 1. a plug for the muzzle of a gun or cannon; 2. a plug for the upper end of an organ pipe
tannaim [< Aramaic, plural of tanna, one who studies or teaches] - rabbinic sages whose views are recorded in the Mishnah
tannaitic - or or relating to the tannaim
tantalize -
tantivy - (adv) at full gallop; headlong; (adj) swift; speedy; (n) a hunting cry; (n) the sound of the horn or horses' hooves
tarry - 1. to delay or be late; 2. to wait; 3. to remain or stay temporarily, as in a place
tarsalgia -
tartare - (adj) chopped fine and served raw
tâtonnement [< Fr, groping, trial-and-error] - a Walrasian auction -- that is, a simultaneous auction such that each agent calculates its demand for the good at every possible price and submits this to an auctioneer
tatum [< Art Tatum] - the lowest regular pulse train that a listener intuitively infers from the timing of perceived musical events; a time quantum; the time division that most highly coincides with note onsets
tautonym - a scientific name of which both parts are identical (e.g., bison bison; gorilla gorilla, hyaena hyaena, gazella gazella, rattus rattus, vulpes vulpes)
tea cozy (tea cosy) - an insulating cover for a teapot
techno riche (< nouveau riche) -
tee - a prototypical state representing any tautology
teetotum - a top, usually having four lettered sides, that is used to play various games of chance
tegestologist -
tegmen (pl: tegmina) (tegmentum) - a covering or integument, such as the tough leathery forewing of certain insects or the inner coat of a seed; either of the leathery forewings of the cochroach and related insects
teleological - exhibiting or relating to design or purpose, esp. in nature
telepario (claytronics; programmable matter) - development or use of moving, physical, three-dimensional replicas of people or objects
temet nosce - (n?) the Latin translation of the Greek aphorism 'know thyself'
temulent -
tendentious - marked by a tendency in favor of a particular point of view; biased
tenuious ?
tephra - fragmental material produced by a volcanic eruption
Terpsichore [terp 'sik u ree] - the Greek muse of dance
terpsichorean [< Grk, terpo, delight + choros, dance] - of, relating to, or enjoying dance
terran computational calendar - a calendar comprising 13 months of 28 days each and a month of 1 or 2 days
terroir - 1. the environmental conditions, esp. soil and climate, in which grapes are grown and that give wine its unique flavor and aroma; 2. (also goût de terroir) the unique flavor and aroma of a wine that is attributed to the growing environment of the grapes; 3. the conditions in which any food is grown or produced and that give the food its unique characteristics
tessitura - the prevailing range of a vocal or instrumental part, within which most of the tones lie
testudo -
tetchy - easily annoyed or irritated; peevish; testy; irascible
tetragrammaton -
Teumessian fox (Cadmean vixen) - a gigantic fox that was destined never to be caught. The fox was one of the children of Echidna. It was said that it had been sent by the gods (perhaps Dionysus) to prey upon the children of Thebes as a punishment for a national crime. Creon, the then Regent of Thebes, set Amphitryon the impossible task of destroying this beast. He discovered an apparently perfect solution to the problem by fetching the magical dog Laelaps, who was destined to catch everything it chased, to catch the Teumessian fox. Zeus, faced with an inevitable contradiction due to the paradoxical nature of their mutually excluding abilities, turned the two beasts into stone. The pair were cast into the stars, and remain as Canis Major (Laelaps) and Canis Minor (Teumessian Fox).
thane - 1. a freeman granted land by the king in return for military service in Anglo-Saxon England; 2. a man ranking above an ordinary freeman and below a nobleman in Anglo-Saxon England; 3. a feudal lord or baron in Scotland
thematic vowel -
thenar - 1. (n) the fleshy mass on the palm at the base of the thumb; 2. (adj) of or relating to the thenar
theodolite - a precision instrument for measuring angles in the horizontal and vertical planes
theological noncognitivism - the argument that religious language, and specifically words like God, are not cognitively meaningful
theosis - the transforming effect of divine grace; becoming or making more godly
Thetis - the mother of Achilles
thieves' cant (rogues' cant; peddler's French) - a cant (i.e., cryptolect) formerly used by thieves and beggars in Great Britain
thigmotropism - a tropism in which contact esp. with a solid or a rigid surface is the orienting factor
thrasonical - bragging and boasting
threadbare -
three hares - a circular motif appearing in sacred sites featuring three hares or rabbits chasing each other in a circle 
tidal force - a secondary effect of the force of gravity due to the nonconstant effect of gravity across the diameter of the earth
timocracy [< Grk, timē = price, value, honor] - 1. government in which a certain amount of property is necessary for office; 2. government in which love of honor is the ruling principle
tintinnabulate -
tintinnabulary -
tipple - 1. to drink (alcoholic liquor) or engage in such drinking, esp. habitually or to excess; 2. alcoholic liquor; 3. an apparatus for unloading freight cars by tipping them
titillate - to interest or excite (someone) in an enjoyable and often sexual way
titivate - to make smart or spruce
tittle -
tmesis [< Grk, tmesis, cutting < temno, I cut] - a linguistic phenomenon characterizing a phrase of two parts, between which other words interrupt [e.g., circum virum dant; kanga-bloody-roos]
Tobin tax - 
tocsin [< Old Occitan, tocar, touch + senh, sign, bell < L, signum] - 1. an alarm bell or the ringing of it; 2. a warning signal
tod - (now UK dialect) 1. male fox; reynard; 2. a person crafty as a fox; 3. a bush, esp. of ivy;
topocracy - a system in which compensation is proportional to the weighted value of a person's position within a network of social connections
Torino scale -a method for categorizing the impact hazard associated with near-earth objects
torpid - 
torpillage -
touchstone -
tourbillion - 1. whirlwind; 2. a vortex esp. of a whirlwind or whirlpool
tout court - (adv) just, simply; without addition or qualification; alone.
to voyage to the Spice Islands - to go to the bathroom
tractate - a treatise; an essay
traiteur - 1. restauranteur; 2. a catering company; 3. in Creole Louisiana, a faith healer
tragus [< Grk, tragos, goat] - 1. a small pointed eminence of the pinna, in front of the concha and projecting backward over the meatus; 2. hair growing at the entrance of the ear
tranche - 1. a slice, section, or portion; 2. one of a set of related securities offered as a part of the same transaction
transfix - a discontinuous affix (i.e., an affix whose phonetic components are not sequential within a word)
transverberate [< L trans + verberare] - 1. to beat, pierce, or strike through; 2. (vt) to cause to experience transverberation; 3. (vi) to experience transverberation
transverberation - religious ecstasy; a state of altered consciousness characterized by (1) reduced external awareness but expanded spiritual awareness, (2) visions, and (3) euphoria
transverse -
trattoria (trä to ree' u) - an informal restaurant or tavern serving simple Italian dishes
trefoil (Dreiblatt) - a graphic form that comprises the outer partial outlines of three overlapping rings and is used in architecture and christian symbolism
tregetour ('trej e ter) [< L, trans + jetere] - a juggler, trickster, or deceiver
trema - diaresis
trenchant - 1. forceful, effective, and vigorous; 2. caustic; cutting; 3. distinct; clear-cut
trencherman -
tribology [< Gr, tribo, I rub] - the science and engineering of interacting surfaces in relative motion
trigger warning - a notice placed before the beginning of an article or post to warn the reader of potential traumatic triggers contained within
tripudiate - to trample an opponent in triumph
triquetra (trinity knot) [< L, quetrus, cornered] - a complicated shape formed of three vesicae piscis, sometimes with an added circle in or around it
triskelion (triskele) [< Grk, skelos, leg] - a motif consisting of three interlocked spirals, three bent human legs, or three bent/curved lines extending from the center of the symbol
tritium - (n) an isotope of hydrogen
troika - 1.a) a Russian vehicle drawn by three horses abreas; b) a team of three horses for such a vehicle; 2.a) a group of three; b) an administrative or ruling body comprising three individuals
troilism -
trompe-l'œil -
troth -
trou normand - eau-de-view, esp. calvados, served as a middle course in large meal in order to restore appetite
truculent - 1. disposed to fighting; pugnacious; 2. expressing bitter opposition; 3. disposed to or exhibiting violence or destructiveness
truel - a duel among three opponents
trundle -
tsktsks - 
tubercle - a wart-like projection
tuff -
tumbrel -
tumult -
tureen - 1. a deep and usually covered bowl from which foods (as soup) are served; 2. casserole
Turingery (Turingismus) - a manual codebreaking method devised by Alan Turing to decrypt the Lorenz cipher
turophile [< Grk tyros, cheese] - a connoisseur of cheese; a cheese fancier
turpitude -
twee - affectedly or excessively dainty, delicate, cute, or quaint
typify - 1. to serve as a typical example of; embody the essential characteristics of; 2. to represent by an image, a form, or a model; symbolize or prefigure
typoglycemia - the purported ability of literate individuals of alphabetic languages to read text such that the interior letters of words are scrambled
Tyrolean traverse -
tzitzit - the Rabbinic sages whose views are recorded in the Mishnah
uchronie [coined by Charles Renouvier] - counterfactual history
uhtceare (ūt ke är' e) - the period right before dawn when one lies awake worrying
ulam spiral (prime spiral; ulam cloth) - a method visualizing prime numbers that reveals the apparent tendency of certain quadratic polynomials to generate unusually large numbers of primes
ullage - 1. the amount of liquid within a container that is lost, as by leakage, during shipment or storage; 2. the amount by which a container, such as a bottle, cask, or tank, falls short of being full
ultima thule - 1. the highest degree attainable; 2. the farthest point; the limit of any journey; 3. the point believed by the ancients to be the farthest north
ultrafidian -
ultracrepidate [< L, crepida, sandal] - to criticize beyond one's sphere of knowledge or expertise
ultrafilter -
ultrapower - an ultrapower of which the factors are all equal
ultraproduct - a quotient of the direct product of a family of structures
ultronious -
umami -
umbe - (dialectical) around, about; after
umbestound [< OE, ymbe, around, about + stunde (accusative of stund), time, hour] - (obsolete or dialectical) at times; from time to time; sometimes
uncia - 1. a twelfth part (e.g. an inch); 2. an ounce; 3. a bronze Roman coin, valued at one-twelfth of an as
uncial [< L uncialis, weighing an ounce < uncia, an ounce, 12th] - 1. a handwriting used esp. in Greek and Latin manuscripts of the 4th-to-8th centuries A.D. and made with somewhat rounded, separated majuscules but having cursive forms for some letters; 2. an uncial letter; 3. a manuscript written in uncial; 4. (adj) written in the style or size of uncials
unciferous - (entomology) bearing a curved process or hook; specifically, having ovipositors with strongly curved tips
underling -
unflappable - persistenly calm, whether when facing difficulties or experiencing success; not easily upset or excited
unguligrade - 1. (adj) walking on hooves; 2. (n) an unguligrade animal
unhandseled - (obsolete) unused; untouched; pure
unwitting - 1. not knowing; unaware; 2. not intended; unintentional
uoiauai ?
unasinous -
undercambered -
undergrope -
unitive - 1. characterized by or tending to produce union; 2. pertaining or relative to a definite magnitude of a physical quantity used as a standard for measurement
unplacable -
unthirlable - impenetrable
upshot - 1. the final result; the outcome; 2. the central idea or point; gist
uptack - a symbol representing falsum
Urheimat -
urn problem - an idealized mental exercise in which some objects of real interest (such as atoms, people, cars, etc.) are represented as colored balls in an urn or other container
uropygium (yuer u pi' jee um) [< Grk, ouro, tail + pyge, rump] - the fleshy and bony prominence at the posterior end of a bird's body that supports the tail feathers
Ursprache -
utility fog -
uxorial -
van dyke - a style of facial hair named after 17th century Flemish painer Anthony van Dyck comprising a moustache and a goatee
vecordious - crazy, senseless, lunatic
venal - 1. open to bribery; mercenary (e.g., a venal police officer); 2. capable of betraying honor, duty, or scruples for a price; corruptible; 3. marked by corrupt dealings, esp. bribery (e.g., a venal administration)
venustraphobia - calligyniaphobia 
veridical - 1. truthful; veracious; 2. coinciding with future events or apparently unknowable present realities (e.g., veridical hallucination)
verism - realism in art and literature; artistic use of contemporary everyday material in preference to the heroic or legendary, esp. in grand opera
verismo - 1. verism; 2. an artistic movement of the late 19th century, originating in Italy and influential especially in grand opera, marked by the use of rural characters and common, everday themes often treated in a melodramatic manner
vernier - (n) 1. A small, movable auxiliary graduated scale attached parallel to a main graduated scale, calibrated to indicate fractional parts of the subdivisions of the larger scale, and used on certain precision instruments to increase accuracy in measurement. Also called vernier scale. 2. An auxiliary device designed to facilitate fine adjustments or measurements on precision instruments. (adj) 3. of, relating to, or having a vernier.
verruca - a wart or warty skin lesion
vesica piscis (mandorla [< Ital, almond]) [< L, bladder of a fish] - the intersection of two circles with the same radius, intersecting in such a way that the center of each circle lies on the perimeter of the other
villipend [< L., vilis, worthless + pendere] - to despise; to make light of; to disparage, slander, or criticize but ususally with a fairly light and mocking tone
viscerotonic - having an amiable, comfort-loving temperament of the kind normally associated with endomorphy
viseme - 1. any of several speech sounds which looks the same, for example when lip reading; 2. the oral configuration necessary to produce a phoneme
vivace - (adv) (music) in a lively or vivacious manner in a lively or vivacious manner
vociferate - to utter (sth) or cry out loudly and vehemently, esp. in protest
voir dire [< Old French, voire < L., verum, truth] [verum dicere] - 1. the process by which prospective jurors are questioned before being chosen to sit on a jury; 2. the process by which expert witnesses are questioned about their backgrounds and qualifications before being allowed to present their opinion testimony; 3. the examination of the background of a witness to assess his or her qualification or fitness to give testimony on a given subject
volar - (adj) of or relating to the sole of the foot or the palm of the hand
volto sciolto, pensieri stretti [< Ital., open face, closed thoughts] - having a frank, ingenuous exterior and a prudent reserved interior
von Neumann probe - a self-replicating spacecraft designed to investigate its target system and transmit info to its origin
Vorfreude - joyful anticipation
Voynich manuscript - an illustrated codex hand-written in the early 15th century probably in Northern Italy by means of an unknown writing system
waldo [by Robert Heinlein] - a device that allows a hand-like mechanism to be remotely controlled by a human operator
wamble - a rumbling sound emanating from the stomach
waftarom - an anticoagulant normally used in the prevention of thrombosis and thromboembolism
wag - 1. a humorous or droll person; a wit; a person full of sport and humor; a ludicrous fellow; a humorist; 2. (archaic) (vi) to be on one's way; to depart; 3. (unverified) to play hookie; to not go to class; to remain absent from school for a day
waggery - 1. waggish behavior or spirit; drollery; 2. a droll remark or act
wale - 1. a mark raised on the skin, as by a whip; a weal or welt; 2. one of the parallel ribs or ridges in the surface of a fabric, such as corduroy; 3. the texture or weave of such a fabric
waggish - characteristic of or resembling a wag; jocular or witty
wassail [< OE, wæs hæl, 'be you healthy'] - 1. a salutation or toast given in drinking someone's health or as an expression of goodwill at a festivity; 2. the drink used in such toasting, commonly ale or wine spiced with roasted apples and sugar; 3. a festivity characterized by much drinking
wastrel - one who is profligate, who wastes time or resources extravagantly
wattle - 1. a construction of poles intertwined with twigs, reeds, or branches, used for walls, fences, and roofs; 2. material for such construction; 3. a fleshy, wrinkled, often brightly colored fold of skin hanging from the neck or throat, characteristic of certain birds, such as turkeys, and some lizards
wax [< OE, weaxan; akin to L, augēre and Gr, auxanein] - 1. a) to increase in size, numbers, strength, prosperity, or intensity; b) to grow in volume or duration; c) to grow toward full development; 2. to increase in phase or intensity; 3. to assume a (specified) characteristic, quality, or state; become (e.g., to wax indignant; to wax poetic)
wayment - to lament
weald - 1. a woodland; 2. an area of open rolling upland
webster - 1. one who weaves professionally
weir - 1. a fence or wattle placed in a stream to catch or retain fish; 2. a dam placed across a river or canal to raise or divert the water, as for a millrace, or to regulate or measure the flow; 3. a long notch with a horizontal edge, as in the top of a vertical plate or plank, through which water flows and with which the quantify of flowing water can be measured
wen - 1. a harmless cyst, especially on the scalp or face, containing the fatty secretion of a sebaceous gland; 2. wynn
wend - 1. to proceed on or along; go; 2. to go one's way; proceed
West Lothian question -
wheelhouse (pilothouse) - an enclosed compartment from which a vessel can be navigated
whilom - 1. (adj) having once been; former (e.g., the whilom editor in chief); 2. (adv) (archaic) at a past time; formerly
Whitsun (Whitsunday, Whit) [< White Sunday] - [UK, Ireland] Pentecost; the seventh Sunday after Easter
Whitsuntide - the week following Whitsun
widdershins (withershins; widderschynnes) - "The coracle whirled round, clockwise, then widdershins."
Winograd schema - a type of sentence such that identifying a referent requires pragmatic contextual understanding (e.g., The city councilmen refused the demonstrators a permit because they [feared/advocated] violence. -- To which group does 'they' refer?) 
witenagemot [< OE witena, [genitive plural of 'wita', councilor], gemot, meeting] - an Anglosaxon advisory council to the king
with squirrel - pregnant
Witzelsucht - an emotional state characterized by futile attempts at humor
wonder-wench - a sweetheart
wot - (archaic) to know
wrest - 1. to obtain by or as if by pulling with violent twisting movements; 2. to usurp forcefully; 3. to extract by or as if by force, twisting, or persistent effort; wring
writefeel - the tactile sensations resulting from the use of a writing instrument
wroth - wrathful, angry
wu wei - the practice advocated by Taoism of letting one's action follow the simple and spontaneous course of nature (as by keeping to minimal governmental organization and regulation) rather than interfering with the harmonious working of universal law by imposing arbitrary strictures
wynn - 1. an Old English rune for the 'w' sound; 2. a kind of timber truck or carriage
wyrd - fate, destiny, esp. in an Anglo-Saxon or Norse context
wyvern - (heraldry) a two-legged dragon having wings and a barbed tail
xanthippe - a nagging, scolding, shrewish wife
xanthodontous -
xenium [< Grk., zenos, guest, stranger] - a gift made to a guest or ambassador; any compulsory gift
xenogenous -
xenomania -
XY problem - the problem associated with one's asking for assistence implementing a faulty solution rather than solving one's actual problem
yare [< Old Eng., gearu, ready, prompt] - marked by quickness and agility; nimble; prepared; easily handled
yawara - a Japanese melee weapon
yawn -
yclept -
yclyketed ?
yeshiva (pl. yeshivot) - a jewish educational institution that focuses on the study of traditionaly religious texts, study being done usually in pairs called chavrutas via daily shiurim (lectures)
yethhounds -
yeuling -
Yggdrasil - an evergreen ash tree, the three roots of which bind together Asgard, Midgard, and Niflheim
yirn -
ylem -
yogh - 1. (Letters of the Alphabet (Foreign)) a character (ȝ) used in Old and Middle English to represent a palatal fricative very close to the semivowel sound of Modern English y, as in Old English ȝeong (young); 2. (Letters of the Alphabet (Foreign)) this same character as used in Middle English for both the voiced and voiceless palatal fricatives; when final or in a closed syllable in medial position the sound approached that of German ch in ich, as in knyȝt (knight). After the 14th century this symbol became the modern consonantal (semivocalic) y when initial or commencing a syllable, and though no longer pronounced in medial position it is preserved in many words by a modern gh, as in thought
yomi (yomi no kuni) - the Shinto concept for the land of the dead
Yule process -
zalgo - a ficitious entity created for an edited comic strip and represented as a malign chaotic entity that manifests itself as corrupted text on web pages
zanshin - a state of relaxed awareness, esp. while practicing a martial art
zarf - 1. a chalicelike holder for a hot coffee cup, typically made of ornamented metal, used in the Middle East; 2. a cardboard holder for hot beverages
zelotipia -
Zeigarnik effect - (n) that people recall incomplete or interrupted taks better than completed tasks
zemblanity - the faculty of making unhappy, unlucky, and unexpected discoveries by design; the inexorable discovery of what we don't want to know
zenzic - the second power of a number
zenzizenzizenzic - the eighth power of a number
zetetic [< Grk, zeteein, to seek] - proceeding by inquiry; a skeptical seeker of knowledge
zings ?
zoanthropy -
zoilism - carping, destructive criticism
zoo hypothesis - a hypothetical explanation for the Fermi paradox that ...
zoonosis (zo ä' nu sis; zo u no' sis) - a disease communicable from animals to humans under natural conditions
zoopharmacognosy - a behaviour in which non-human animals apparently self-medicate by selecting and ingesting or topically applying plants, soils, insects, and psychoactive drugs to treat or prevent disease
zori - a flat sandal with thongs, usually made of straw or leather
zucchetto [c.f. calotte] - a small, round skullcap worn by Roman Catholic ecclesiastics
zugzwang - a situation (as in a chess game) in which a player is forced to make an undesirable or disadvantageous move
zyghost - the essence of a thing before, during, and after that thing's existence; a timeless, permanent encoding of a thing that transcends the thing itself
zygodactyly - two digits forward, two back
zygomorphic [< Grk, ζυγόν, yoke] - of or pertaining to flowers with only one axis of symmetry
